くそ 読みたいが買ったら負けな気がする 図書館に出ねーかな
gg this one's over. off to watch the NFL draft I guess
Are you really implying we return to those times or anywhere near that political environment?  If so, you won't have much luck selling the American people on that governance concept without ushering in American Revolution 2.0.
No one has a European accent either  because it doesn't exist. There are accents from Europe but not a European accent.
That the kid "..reminds me of Kevin."   so sad :-(
Haha, i was getting nauseous from it, if that was your ingame experience that would have given a whole new level of Bloodborne ^^ 
After reading this, I wholeheartedly believe you should let her go.   You and her simply aren't compatible. She's looking for a committment and you're bent on avoiding it. You should figure out your committment issues before getting into a committed relationship.  
Let's do this. See you guys on the other side.
You can buy a mystery sampler from small batch and request them
Nihilum and LG are significantly better off in theory. I can't really think of a replacement for Ptr that would leave CLG in a better place than they were before. Cloud9 should be much better, but you never know.
Fuck that what
Don't diss the Grim Puncher!
Your 16 bars seems to focus on introducing yourself rather than a life you think is worth living. I understand if you introduced yourself in a few lines that made sense to the theme such as the line “I fear my life remains aimless, I traded paper for a lane switch.” That made sense to the theme because it could be used to tell the audience how you don’t have a life worth living (yet). But lines like “If you fight me, I'ma show hands and throw down on yo ass like the young motherfucking Sylvester Stallone has” has a place for introducing yourself, but not for the theme of a life worth living.
Trinus vr is amazing but it'd be cool to be able to just sit anywhere and play without turning the pc on, it seems like a waste not making fully functional games for gc.
It's not your fault don't think that. Hey if this helps it does then if it doesn't well. At least I can talk about it.  I shot my dog. I had him for 10 years. I can home from partying and it was New Years so I was going to shoot off my .40 so...  Well I was loading it outside and I shot it off accidentally. Right into my dog. Me having about 5-7 tequila shots into me though if I go to sleep I would wake up and he would be okay. Well if I called a vet when I shot him I could have saved him. Or at least from his pain. So I woke up saw a dead dog in my yard… i cried for hours. That old dog still had a few good years in him.   That was my fault and you sitting on a little tiny mouse is more understandable than a man discharging a firearm into a shitzu. Don't feel to bad. 
http://www.reddit.com/comments/125gb1/some_of_the_best_comments_from_the_rsoccer_and/
and what about all of the players who hit vr 14 after 1.6 but before the removal of them?
I would be tempted to excuse myself to the bathroom every time (so you don't piss him off, because he's your boss), with disgusting details (for negative reinforcement purposes).   "Hold on, sir, I really want to hear more about the mucus plug, but I have to run before I end up with mushy green diarrhea in my pants. Be right back."
I can't answer better than Acquittal.   I just want you to know that I think you made the right decision. Good luck ! 
NSFL
I'd recommend, if you have the time, to get an account with Citibank and get the Citibank Plus transaction account - they have no fees on currency conversion or transfers and charge no international atm withdrawal fees. Been using them recently for my overseas trips, pretty handy.
I'm just an ordinary collector like everyone else here. Frankly, I think you and everyone else who do giveaways are awesome. It gives people who never had the chance to get these two, to FINALLY get them. If I win, cool. If I don't, then it's cool that it ended up in the hands of someone here that also wanted WFT and Ike.
Get back to your pott harry.
99.99% of the power is filtered on the motherboard before it reaches any core components. hence no crashing, really shitty power supply will cause it to crash if its really bad, I.E. bad caps in the PSU. good grammar and punctuation on the Internets dose not mean you're smart, douche. 
At least we got StevenBomb.
Me too. Same hammock fabric, too.
I would like to use them for training 
Dodger's got a video on it on her Dexbonus channel, and Sam has a video of it on his channel, but yeah basically his visa is expiring. They have to go back to long distance for probably a year at least, but I wouldn't worry about them. They seem like they're in it for the long haul.
well i think new ashe is good at killing tanks but i would just switch up the build i think ie &gt; static/pd is must have on ashe as first items and i would never switch them up then &gt; lw/bc whatever feels/is better &gt;lw/bc/bt/botrk (whatever is over and u feel in need) &gt;runnans/scimitar/botrk/bc/bv  never lw last item obv but there can be so many things changed up in ashe builds i hope to test this cuz im super hyped for new ashe :D
Oh, i don't find those annoying or obtuse. That's on you friend. 
Extended wheelies have a tendency to starve one of the cylinders of oil, if that's something you're into. Can't speak from experience but it was always warned of on the forums when I had mine. 
I'm a guy and I had no idea this was a thing guys did.
The fire escape is there. You hear wood splintering, and look to see that a raptor has managed to break a hole in the top of the door, just above the dresser. Its head pokes through, then disappears. There's another thud, and the dresser moves forward a few inches.
Mid twenties male rocking skinny jeans/pants, have a styled hair cut, and generally make a strong effort to look good. Setting off gaydars for nearly 10 years. The kicker is my little brother is actually gay, and he is all rugged macho man. 
How so?  Importing &gt;8kgs of heroin - that is going to be cut (with God knows what) and pumped into the veins of addicted Australians, is bound, statistically, to have caused at least one drug related overdose death.  Is that drawing too long a bow?  I think not.  ...and the crime is treated in a similar way to murder - from a penalty perspective.
今まで動いてたのに目立たなかったのか？   そもそも動いてなかったのか？
Definitely test a few.  I was told as a beginner I would be happy with a 10 ft sit-on. But I have some boating experience,  and ended up with a 12.5 ft sit-in.  I love the weight and the response time.  And I can go a lot further in it.  Splash splash! 
thanks for your contribution :3 Ill still wait a little for more people helping me
It would be wise to think carefully about how you treat those of clan Photoshop. 
In other words, never make a decision, and you will remain forever free
He's not claiming a god exists. He's positing a god exists and he's positing that someone created him.
That's something you hear a lot from people when discussing huge builds like this, especially with new vehicles.  For starters, the interior. Heated leather automatic electronic cooled touch screen activated everything, most guys don't want to do a crazy overhaul on their interior and if you have money to burn (this is a hypothetical dream build after all) why not get the one with the fanciest interior?  Then there's the fact that the Rubicon trim level comes with a bunch of required off road kit. Lockers, heavy duty axles, and an electronic disconnecting sway bar to name a few... these are all features that any self respecting modern off roader would have. So, you could buy a Sahara or well equipped Sport for like $35K then spend 20 grand (or better) on axle swaps, gear swaps, skid plates, locking differentials, etc, voiding warranty, or you could just buy a stock Rubicon for $45K that comes with all that gear from the factory. In the long run it's just cheaper to buy the Rubicon if you plan on doing a serious build.   
very interested indeed
Because we aren't responsible for the actions of our forebears?  We should help these people not because of some race karma but because of love for your common man.   And we've tried. We give them advantages by giving them things like affirmative action, diversity quotas and scholarships that white people (even ones as poor or poorer) don't get. They don't want change.   The black community has lashed out against a problem for which even they don't have a solution.   What do they want from us? To abolish police and law? To remove punishments for black crime and release black criminals? To force white people to not leave a neighborhood when black people start moving in (and as a measurable consequence, an increase in crime)?   The cause of their problems lie in two places:   The actions of a misguided "community" in which individuals use race as an excuse to commit more crime  And individual prejudice inside of every day people who collectively make life harder for them.   The former of the the two possibly being a consequence of the latter but I digress. The second one won't be fixed with violent riots and crime. It only makes more racists. And the only way you could forcibly change that would be with an Orwellian Thought Police system which is immoral on the deepest level.   How do you change the mind of the individual? I'm not completely sure. Nobody really is. If black rioters/criminals started taking responsibility for their actions, made an effort to improve relations with the common man and stopped glorifying thuggish and criminal activity, white people would take notice and shift even further from their subconscious racist tendencies.   Because when something is so baked in to your consciousness, being a person isn't enough to earn a chance to not be hated, you need to give people a reason to not be racist towards you. (and I'm not saying this is how it should be, it's just how it is) 
The only ones I'm surprised we haven't seen are any Bjork song and Walking On Sunshine by Katrina and The Waves
I'm just glad we're done with mock draft season. 
'There are no bad tactics, only bad targets' - some dumbass  Getting mad ain't the problem, its how that anger is expressed...which happens to be the same damn way every time.  SJW is just a subset of entitled internet asshole.
It's the pants
On my Schalke save I'm using the same formation but retain possession short passing and work ball into box. Then against big teams and tough away games I go play narrower and exploit the flanks and against easier teams at home I go play wider. Whipped crosses, Close down More, Get stuck in on both.   I have one DLP and BBM in my home tactic and a BWM and a DLP in my away tactic. Meyer I play Attacking Mid so he contributes more to the defensive side of things. One WB on my home tactic and 1 FB and 2 FBs on my away tactic.   I had to get another good midfielder so I bought the two Romero's, bought Silva for the LB, luckily their front 4 are all great starters including the back ups so I haven't had to buy much there. 
Scary...
As the great Alex James said, "A man with a Barbour jacket and a bottle of champagne is invincible" - get the Barbour! It compliments your build the best and it's just an awesome jacket
Any tips/ suggestions on this so far? 
Well yeah. The first two games Washington won, everyone was still bitching at him for bad plays 
Fran Drescher laughing
I honestly wouldn't have believed it if I didn't live it. She made his life hell and I had a front row seat. I'm just glad I had a front row seat to her confession and firing. :)
What I suggested ? It's not the point of hitting a car or not. It's the way it's done.....with a reputation system as I proposed you would end up in races with a similar driver i.e clean, or dirty.
&lt;/3 
Cleveland checking in!
There is also many intelligence service players in area. It is easiest to create a large conflict with the false flag terrorist attacks on both sides and encourage the cycle of revenge.
Yep!
http://sfmsnip.tumblr.com/
Added. I hope it is not too late. I'd really like a Snubbull.
no money, just ID, driver license, credit cards and a subway stampcard
**[STREAMLINK](http://intsports.net/str10.html)** Courtesy of /r/nbastreams and /u/djramaa
1-She got to be a bigwig at Google by sleeping with the boss 2-She is a sociopath
I can see how that could easily go. People often rate for enjoyment. When you're at the end of that show you can be like "Aw it's over? That's how they end it? Oh well, I guess it was good throughout the season. 7... or maybe an 8" but then you go back and think about it a little "Hmm why did I give it a 7 again? Yeah I liked the char... wait I didn't like the characters, they were all douchebags. There must have been one... Aoyama? And fuck the whole thing was frustrating. Fuck! Why did I like it again? ... I can't come up with anything. Now that I remember it was a terrible show, fuck! It's not even a 6, the whole thing was so shitty... more like a 4!"  I wouldn't count that as overanalysing. It's just that when the art and the characters are pretty you can forget and forgive a show for many things without realizing. Once this guy remembered the show was bad and there weren't more episodes or cute art to keep him distracted he gave it a more honest personal score.  Of course all of this is probably overanalyzing on **my** part but it probably went somewhat like that.
Holy shit, I couldn't tell if some of those scenes were sped up or they were actually moving that fast.  I need to watch more Martial Arts movies!
so fucking inspirational 
ErickCachorroZL157
i'm pretty sure the line is "we ain't broke, on tour" because of the misconception that they had broken up, despite tweeting that they hadn't, in addition to tweeting "we're going on tour"
I'd do it, because, well...fish.
Download razer surround. It'll have the option to upgrade it in the program
&gt;maybe jews  not maybe
D'awww thnx :)
Do you get to just make up your nickname on NFLN? Because if that guys is "Money" I'm henceforth to be known as the "Dance Commander".
I would love it. Him or Byron Jones from Uconn.   Our backfield would rush for 2,500+ yards easy between him and Hyde/Bush.   Not to mention Kap running the ball. 
Smoking tobacco. Went from shitty pall-malls to Marlboro to Turkish Silvers to American Spirits to hand-rolled to pipe before I decided I was going to die if I kept going.
https://i.imgur.com/snLplqq.jpg
hmm interesting events, how many attends weekly ops? do you guys use modd?
Shitpost in r/shitpost.... shitception
Bootleg Fireworks
Very low level, subtle mania.  From my coworkers reactions I'd guess it's just efficient zombie mode.  What I notice more often is that I'm physically tired.  Still alert enough mentally.  Dumb typo mistakes from my mind has moved on but the fingers are left to finish up the words.  Last night I get maybe 3-4 hours sleep.  Waking up kind of sucks, but when I first wake up, the brain fog lifts right away.  The next today (today) I'll go to bed earlier.  That means I'll wake up in the middle of night.  Once awake, wide awake.  But I know to wait and eventually fall asleep again or my sleep schedule is even further off.  Since I got more sleep, I can stay up a long time the next day.  And then on the weekends I'm ending up staying in bed, dozing or sleeping until the afternoon or evening.  Memory consolidation I still wonder about.  Am I not remembering as much if I sleep less?  Is my brain processing everything faster than normal, and it just doesn't need any extra time?  In terms of time having extra hours in the day is nice.  I get more done.  And that's translated into spending more time at work.  $$$  In terms of quality, it's kind of blah.  Blah before, blah now, but I feel less here.
woulda been perfect if he had been like "it's legitimately in my top 10"
I'm a member of the tea party.
Henchmen beware! Batman does not care if you are taking a shit.
Don't get me wrong as I'd love to give you a comprehensive, well-written response, but I have much more valuable ways to spend my time than to reply to your straw arguments and vitriol. Things like masturbating, or watching the universe age. 
A speech class
But that isn't what is going on. You keep saying throwing bricks or rocks. That is the least of Baltimore s problem. The violence isn't even against the police.  It is against businesses and people, predominantly white people. That is racism. None of it is justified. Just like the LA riots weren't  I am white &amp; I am not a racist. I don't support racism.
I can't understand why they are so expensive, especially with the  console versions going for $2.  PC i supposed to be cheaper!
Did well on my quiz today, am now eating ice cream. Good day.
M8. C'mon.
All the ghosts are running even though they aren't blue. Everyone knows Blinky would be on that ass. On a serious note, good work OP, love the art style.
How oh how did you get tier 4 without a hacker or hotwire???
oh.. Well, sorry for the rage then. Also thank you for clearing it up and being so kind.
That's one reason for it, but not the only one.  The other major one is the increased incidence of forced sex / indoctrination between families.
Ya razor to laser. Checks out
Well no. It was in the middle of a study hall and I was in school. But still, knowing my paranoid anxiety fits the two things I'd be transfixed on would be either getting her pregnant or catching a disease. 
I love malt vinegars.
Looks-wise yes, play-wise no
Sweet , great Idea there as well 
Thanks for the heads up! Good to know!
Bruh
VERY looking forward to *Pollo Empire* once Better Call Saul finishes it's sixth season!
Can we sticky these main 4 threads? 
what does it look like now?
Right, the tens of thousands of people who installed their own all killed themselves.  Electricity is only dangerous if you're stupid and don't follow the electrical code.  Its very simple stuff that you can pick up if you're handy and can read.  Do have a licensed electrician install the crossover switch as most municipalities require that.
Some hands don't physically allow you to claw 
Go back to Route 21, dude.
I'm trying to eat a fucking fajita here dammit
Thank you for your advice. I'll try to remember that this all takes time-even though it's frustrating :)
Legalize medical marijuana in 2001 too! Just goes to show how forward thinking this guy is.
They're oh-so-bravely standing up to the massive circlejerk... only to be showered in upvotes, and probably gold.
Honestly I don't have as much of a problem paying for Chroma's when they are for the base texture and not for a skin. The "Blucian" as I'll call it for now, is one I want to get, and will probably purchase at some point and feel the price is, while above what I would say is worth the value of it, what I will pay for this **one** in particular.  However I do think it's worth looking into other ways of obtaining the Chroma's outside of RP purchases.
i love your ass also i can see why he does to
Yeah, but [60% boards,](http://i.imgur.com/gKoR38B.png) and the like, have layouts that are of normal size, just very minimal in all other aspects. What I mean is, all the keys are about the same size, and about the same distance from each other as larger, more regular keyboards; they just have fewer keys and lower profile casings etc.  This keyboard looks like all the keys are smaller, and not spaced out to compensate for the size, meaning the whole layout is very compressed. Must be intended for mobile/portable use.
Sounds to me like unprofitable businesses are finding anything to blame but themselves for their failures.  Nah, can't be.  People who run businesses are all brilliant captains of industry incapable of failure, right?
I think the whole "American politics are crazy" thing came from the fact that they are relatively transparent and that we treat them half seriously and half as entertainment value and then export them to the rest of the world for the same purpose.  If you have a modicum of understanding of how the American system works and who some of the major personalities are, you can enjoy shows like the Daily Show.  I'm sure satirical political programming exists in other countries, but we've mastered the genre.  Plus its like sports-- we can banter about how bad our team's draft picks were and how congress/the president/the democrats/the republicans are taking us to hell in a hand basket over a few beers.  because when I read about some of the political sleaze that goes on in other countries that I never hear about, I'm fascinated and amazed.
Fuck pound coins... thick and heavy fuckers with almost no use...
discontinued...for a good reason .   .   .   oops
Woo. 2015 NFL Draft Draft, here we go.
Rainbow is just too much fun to not do at least once.
We do like them !!!
Someone was telling me a long story about an elderly man they knew who had recently gotten remarried after his wife died.  I was barely listening and said something like "when did she die?", to which they replied "2 years ago", to which I replied.. "oh that's cute". Then realized I meant it was cute he got remarried or something.  Whatev I'm an ass and I don't listen.  
That means each of those teams will play two games back-to-back. This isn't a best of series like they normally do, it's seeing which team can gather the most wins throughout the tournament. At least, that's what I've gathered about it.
freelancer i0wa 31 warlock
I'm pretty sure that's the peace music.
This shouldn't be fucking with me as much as it is
I'd bet ui gets faster, probably refreshed look (probably nothing major) and new functionality (streaming, app store, background apps, etc)
Good thing you didn't get pulled over by a Cop, who would have taken that cash off your hands.
Thank you kind strangers
priv8
If he's first to die, he'll act like the round is already over. 
Nope. 
Because they, in fact, we the British, are cowards who shy away from real, painful issues like Rotherham, and squabble over non-issues like this. 
Yes! He is the most ethical and not racist of all GGers!
Yes, that's what's going on.  "Fatter" means something different to a starving child than it does to a 300lb adult.
&gt;a woman's life was torn apart  Dude, she has fame, a successful career, a rich boyfriend, and legions of devoted supporters. Her life was torn apart? She's living the American Dream.
You would do mdadm --detail /dev/sda[x], on the partition, not the drive.  List the output from the partitions of each md.  Use pastebin if you need to.  List what drives you have, which are the existing ones, and which is the replacement.  List the output of fdisk -l.
In commenting on the botch, you botched your words. Beautiful.
Why choose to stop glazing all the way through?
THANK YOU!  Everywhere else on that site I tried needed me to login to something and I wasn't having any of it.
Not Heather's fault! Dakota fail...
[A$AP Rocky - Purple Swag (Jim-E Stack Remix)](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RGwbF8rCX6s)   Not a top five list, but I really think this one's worth a listen.
Here is a better idea of the changes I would like to see made: http://www.docdroid.net/yz50/a-list-of-tweaks.pdf.html   Once I have some free time, I'm going to try working these into a mod.
Difficult to tell from the potato but maybe a [silverfish](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Silverfish)
Blue Dream &amp; Lean 2- Juicy J  If You're Reading This It's Too Late- Drake  Sorry 4 the Wait 2- Lil Wayne
"Japanese slut double penetrated by horny black guys"......  Am I one of the black guys or am I the Asian chick? It could mean the difference between getting my ass rammed by two ginormous dongs and having rough sex with a cute girl.
"That's great and all, but what about my anecdotal evidence?"  "Same industry" means nothing. I know a lot of people in my "industry" that make way more and way less for no particular reason other than different companies pay different amounts.
I'm not wearing the - oh... dude, what the f- Chill dude!
That's not silence. That's the sound of thousands of clenched assholes. 
Idiot, tattoos are permanent. 
I experience this too, I think it's just a bug you have to get used to.  I've tried everything as far as encasing them entirely in obsidian and they still escape. It seems to occur when you leave the area and then return to it or close the game and reload while near it.
/r/DickPics4Freedom [NSFW]
You double posted.
The implications of that varies between cultures. Don't be racist.
He'd make a great extra in The Walking Dead.
I think only once actually.
How much does a mod this unnecessarily large and gorgeous set you back if you don't mind me asking?
I don't know. Where?
Was that close to ozil leaving when he said it? I'm not aware of the situation with ozil's transfer aside from Real Madrid fans being really upset at him leaving but i did not follow the team/la liga itself much at that time.
What did the 5 fingers say to the face?  #Pau!!!
What was the process like for you to join the boarding party?
Happy to help. Do note that I didn't get to wear it as much as I wanted, so the leather MIGHT get softer after breaking it in more. But I'll have to wait for better weather to bring it out.
I Don't Really Know Why... But Why Not? :)
*I am a bot whose sole purpose is to improve the timeliness and accuracy of responses in this subreddit.*  ---  **It appears you forgot to include your location in the title or body of your post.**  **Please update the original post to include this information.**  ---  [Report Inaccuracies Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/LocationBot/) | [Author](http://reddit.com/u/ianp) ---  Original Post: **Boss required me to sign a document waiving my right take a lunch/breaks. Help /r/legaladvice!** &gt; I work in the food service industry in Seattle, and have been with my current company for about 5 years. Back in December, every member of our customer service staff (it's a small corporate chain, less than 200 employees) was required to sign [this document](http://imgur.com/iwa6IEQ), or else have all of our shifts cut to 4 hours each in length or less.  I work for minimum wage, and have never been offered or granted a raise by this company when I've asked.  I'm not passionate about my currently line of work, but my personal sense of justice feels violated to the point of needing to put my foot down. &gt;  &gt; I know what you're thinking: "Get a new job!" And yes, I'm in the process of looking for another job using other skills. A few of my coworkers are like family to me.  While I might be able to leave the situation, they aren't as fortunate, and that frustration bugs me to no end. The management at this company has stepped over the line of reason, and I'm not sure what legal recourse to utilize, or where to start. &gt;  &gt; -I know that their encouraging me to sign this document is illegal. &gt; -I also know that I would lose my job if my employer read this post (as such, I've removed the header from the document) &gt;  &gt; What do I do /r/legaladvice!?  Halp!
That's a pretty good edit. The もし increases the sense of "if," and the 見つけられたら makes the meaning something like "if I was able to find rum on the island," which is also more emotive than "if I found rum on the island."
"Why don't you just eat it you weirdo?" -My girlfriend
Seems morally questionable to me, but if that's what you support? I would disagree but to each their own.
So it's literally bots buying it?
You're just trying to get to the front page.  I see through your facade!!!
Let's face it, we also couldn't imagine small animals beating each other to death with fire, but then it happened when Pokemon released and we see it just fine. 
Would you like more salt on that rant ?
4 defend 1 where the 1 is the weakest hero and not worth ganking. He may offer xp but he will yield such low gold. I think it is a legitimate strat in itself. 
Faith is not based on logic or reason, and therefore, logic and reason are of little import to the faithful, and of little use in defeating faith.  A theist could answer any and all of these questions with a blithe "Isn't God amazing?  He can do ANYTHING!!".
ひたぎクラブOP
Just wait till you hop on the juice. Will never feel the same.
Huh, I never knew about the double space trick.   Thanks!
Is this from a show or....?
Looks like something that could be in vintage versace.
 try to get loud please
I've got two tickets to taradise!
[](/rocklobster) what would you like in return?
But if the alarm doesn't wake you up, how would you tap? If you're a deep sleeper, you could just set a loud, long alarm.
i dont know, things get added into COMING SOON a week in advance anyway, and are in the files long before.  ^^i ^^just ^^really ^^am ^^lonley ^^without ^^anyone ^^else ^^to ^^be ^^tron ^^magrider ^^with
I live in a rural area and have been sold 'high speed' internet before by a representative by phone.  I received all the account information, dsl router, and it was totally legitimate.  Of course, did not have dsl available in my area and I had to return all the equipment they shipped to me in a timely manner.   We really need more people holding these guys accountable for this kind of shit.
In a show of friendship, I'm gonna join the Jets fans in booing their draft pick
Try Dominion and Betrayal at House on the Hill (terrible name, I know). They are not difficult in any sense, but great boardgames!
Well, I do see where you're coming from, but since the system is impossible, I"m going to stick with democracy:)
On an unrelated note, does anyone notice how close Poland resembles the Third Reich at its maximum expansion?
Whatchu doing here Hawkeye?
The Dragonborn has the problem of being a PC, a character which is undefined apart from their destiny (i.e. the Main Quest).  What could be said, however, is that the Dragonborn does face their destiny. They are not ignorant or avoiding of their purpose, and are up to the challenge.
It looks like anime?
It's like the living people are zombies and the dead one is a survivor.
I truly believe with this combination, we only lose to ourselves. No team can compete consistently if we keep this effort up.
Yeah. People try to make a defending argument, but they always end up sounding like poetic, pretentious bullshit. They jump though hoops to try and find ways to make it true, but it's just not.
You can buy 100% MSG at stores and online. It's called "Accent Flavor Enhancer."
Thank you everyone.  I will show my family the letter I have drafted and then send it tomorrow. 
I'm a purp... biggest regret of my life. Haunts me to this day.
Love their trivia
$100 gift card. $75 coupon for xbone. i also traded in 2 controllers. so another $30 on the gift card. then at the register i handed them the $50 gift card coupon, then the $75 off coupon, then the gift card. Since I was in NH, no taxes, I paid $145 and walked out with a $50 gift card. pretty sweet deal
Even though it is enver explained in game, you have to admit, without them, rolling would not at all be viable. Sure, you can roll away but it is guranteed that they WILL clip you every time. 
[](/twismirk) Not even a hint?
My time to shine.
even when we make a play it goes back to them :(
Sure :-) I'm not a professional by any means, but I'll do my best to help.
It said it needed to reboot the one time, not sure if it's everytime.
For those about to lynch this guy [here](http://ne.reddit.com/r/PoliticalDiscussion/comments/2t21p7/the_supreme_courts_billion_dollar_mistake_article/cnuzsv9) is a short and sweet write up that sides with citizens united
&gt; do you know what a limited hangout is?  the 40 yr old buzzword du jour that you and all the people on the Conspiracy boards apparently just stumbled upon, like the term "False Flag"? no never heard of it.
Guys, please get help if you ever begin thinking suicidal thoughts.  I lost a great friend after we graduated boot camp to suicide, and I just wish he had asked for help.  That was 5 years ago, and I still think about it all the time, wishing I had been able to do something.  Let someone know that you're not okay. Police officers routinely see the worst that society has to offer, and it's easy to lose yourself in the mess if you don't have the right coping mechanisms set up.  My academy has stressed a lot about stress management and officer suicides, and it's hard to think of how many officers turn their weapons on themselves.  
#FUCK GOODELL
I mean you still need someone to fetch you cold beers and change the TV channels when the remote breaks though. 
Time to watch My So Called Life. 
You are dreamy eyes  Wow  7/10
I've used goodra in battle spot doubles, I love its tankiness, I could fit it almost on any team!
School is considered a social setting. So therefor OP has no reason to not introduce himself. And if she doesn't even know he exists, then it's even more reason to introduce himself.  If he never introduces himself, he may never get the chance. They might not know the same people, or go to the same events, or anything. So what does he do in that case? Because by what you're saying, there is nothing he can do. So why not just introduce himself? If she finds it weird, then that's on her, unless, like I stated earlier, he makes it weird. If he just introduces himself, that's not weird, nor should it ever be considered weird.
Holy shit. Blast from the past right here. 
TL:DR genuis and his professor invent not time travel but dimension travel. they "slide" to a new dimension at the same time and place. they are stuck there for X (random) amount of time. also joining them are his girlfriend and a random singer who happened upon the wormhole they made. each episode shows about 30 seconds of one dimension, then the whole time at another, and the first 30 seconds or so at a last one
I can offer DK Freeze for 20.
Daum created a second patch immediately after the 1st DL. The patch is 353, but Loki's English patch is looking for 352...so it's not installing. Loki has to update his software for 353.
&gt; Reika, I know you're getting dogpiled on this thread, but I'm gonna go ahead and point out that saying your machines are quieter than explosions is not really a great defense.  My point was that they are quieter than many other vanilla sounds, not "ten times louder" like most people allege.
crystal maiden in korean dota = 수정의 여인 여인=woman, crystal=수정 which could also mean to modify/edit. they are two different words that sound the same.
You need to have a bald eagle perched on your shoulder
I did not realize this my bad
That's actually the problem, some people don't have that problem.  I own a OPO alongside with 3 other friends.  None of us have screen issues and they were all bought at separate times.   However the touching feels different in one of the OPO's of my friends where if it's not your thumb pressing stuff sometimes it won't recognize the touch. Still it's not recurrent.  So yeah, I believe they dealt all their cards but some of us apparently got a faulty cell phone...   Still most people who have a working cell phone won't be here to say this every time for each faulty cell phone of other users..   So yeah try to RMA first, you might get lucky.
I'm technically wagging school *Kappa*  But yeah, good day. 
Rick James and his future wife once kidnapped a woman and did some pretty fucked up shit to her. [Here's the link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rick_James#Legal_problems) if you're interested.
Tagged you as "wise person" given how frequently bigoted /r/videos tends to be. Thank you so much for taking the time to properly point out what should be so motherfucking basic -- but isn't.
We shouldn't do what commercials tell us to do....
And my point wasn't about which was better, sorry if it came across like that. My point was that you should include the different types of BC pipes in your calculation.   In other words, it's true that all BC Pipes are 2 crafting steps each; but you'll probably need more than one type of pipe to complete any connection.  Equally important is that every EIO conduit uses a base of Conduit Binder, which you can craft in large batches. In essence, you can subtract two steps from every EIO Conduit after the first time you make a Conduit.
Does anyone know why the University of California would contribute so much?  Are they representing the entire public education lobby or..
Light armor is not required to heal effectively. Heavy armor healers can heal quite well, with very little threat to their own health pool, particularly when taking minor dmg themselves. 
ESPN or NFL Network????
dont guys have a hole in the undies?
Dude. This is either on point or the biggest jinx ever.  Thank the Lawd we have the Curry factor!
Absolutely. Restrict the airflow a smidgen and turn it up to ~27 watts. Bam, flavor for days. Would help to know what juice it is. 
Gametime!
Fuck that.
&gt;Than what does it test?  The presence of at least two named female characters who talk about something other than a man.  &gt;Not only is this a loaded assertion (which I'd argue carries a good/bad judgement),  Your inference is not my implication. If you have another term that you think is less loaded to describe uneven representation of populations in media, we could use that instead.  &gt;it doesn't follow from the premise.  What premise?
Hah... You don't know me, but I am the Queen of negativity. Well I was I was deposed by taking charge of my life. Somewhere around here I still have the crown though. 
When I was speaking of humane, I meant more humane than getting mauled to pieces by an angry dog and left to suffer. I know those factories aren't perfect. 
yeah I've been a dickhead for a while dude
1 day, apparently.
You've got two monitors, don't you?  Raid on one, be an activist on the other. Just don't get them confused and ask Sanders to subsidize bandages and first aid training for your character.
Have you checked the crafts isle at Walmart? At the one near me it isn't with the foods.
The cards is nothing super great except for height but he is good.
No problem, just keep it in mind next time へ( ◉ ᴥ ◉ )〜
&gt;The genders aren't being mixed by this rule, they're being unmixed. Thing is, trans people are going to make people uncomfortable regardless of which locker room they use.  Not unless they use their own pre-surgery or stick to the one they were assigned to at birth until they get surgery.  &gt;The trans person will look way more out of place under the current system. It's shown pretty universally that allowing trans people to use facilities necessary for them to live as their gender generally leads to an increase in quality of life.   But lower it for others?
I've ridden a 1820 cc Indian. 910 cc per cylinder :)
The Green Mile
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I0vSpewcMx4
"Oh you're from Canada? Where's that? Like, close to England?"
Wankers.
Like, uh butt stuff?
/u/3vans Where's the flair?
If we fuck this up...
Nice content stealing
So what was the purpose of the metal cage structure just forward of the seed tube (~2:38 in the video)  Looks like the cage for a utility light.
This PSA doesn't appear if you have subreddit styles turned off. I was so confused. For far too long.
When I was a youngster until I was I was in my teens, I had the same recurring figure. Not the same dream, always ended differently with different events but always started with the same figure. Let me paint the picture here first. My bedroom window looked out on to a culdersac at the top of a very steep hill. It was lit by one street lamp. If you looked out into it at night, culdersac would be lit but it's entry would plunge off into oblivion. So from my window every night, I could see what looked like (to me) the poster from The Exorcist.  Now, the dream would always start the same. I'd be sleeping, and wake up to the faint incoming tune from beyond the hill. I would hear this tune grow as the figure of my nightmares would make it's way, lumbering up the hill. The tune was some sort of low double bass Looney Tunes or Tom &amp; Jerry number I can never find the name of. The figure? Sweetums from The Muppets. He would dance/lumber up into the light of the culdersac and I would immediately try to hide under the covers or bed or in the closet, nothing ever worked. I'd always hear him coming into the house and then down the hallway, into my room where he would proceed to violently fling me against shit until I was broken and laid their bleeding before finally putting me out of my misery and crushing my head. Often either with his foot, something nearby or by just biting down.  Over the years the dream varied as I learned to run and hide and escape into different areas of the house but everything always ended the same. One of the most messed up scenarios once was when he had two dogs, big white wolves actually. He sicked them on me and that went just swimmingly. Another time he possessed my family and turned them all into red eyed catatonics who if I approached them they'd open their mouths wide as a snakes and reveal their teeth and tongue (looked like the mouth of a freaking deep sea angler fish), horrifying.  The last time I dreamed about Sweetums though was the most interesting...  The dream started the same way it always did. The impending music, Sweetums lumbering into the light of the culdersac, but this time I didn't hide. I didn't even leave my room. In fact I just sat there, waiting, watching the door for Sweetums. And as the music got to it's usual loud state with his proximity he stopped in the door way and just stared at me. Me at him and him back at me. For the first time ever he spoke, in my Dad's voice... "Well done. I'm proud of you." Then he walked away.  I've never seen him since... 7 years of recurring nightmares at it ends with that.
Or do, just clean up.
THEY KNOW!!!
We *all* win if round pizzas cut the right way are served.
Fuck Lithia
He's a PhD in history, and teaches history, and is a historical consultant to the ABC, SBS, Film Australia, etc.
I've definitely been noticing Klein
It's lucky we don't see what goes on in multi-layered circuit boards...
Sure, go ahead :)  Equipment, acquisition and processing details can be found [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/astrophotography/comments/34ektz/moon_mosaic_seems_to_be_a_popular_theme_nowadays/cqtv4da)
Should crop that checkbook out of the pic. 
Can I have a job? 
Day ass do
Christ.
That's funny considering Keith is from SF 
[Source](http://www.pixiv.net/member_illust.php?mode=medium&amp;illust_id=47885650)
Specification changes   Sickness effect used to just decrease Rec. It is now boost chances for status ailment inflicted and boost weakness element damage.
Not so well. Rebellious people of my age. 
Mario Party:Island Tour
Depends on how you present yourself both in the message and what your profile is like.  Linkedin is a professional recruiting site. 
Been this GIF
4 times is just plain slovenly. Its not at least 17 times a day, its bad hygiene and bad *luck*. Expect to loose a family member for every time you miss a day of washing.
I have MyWi but it sets up the i5 as the hotspot. I'm looking for a tweak where the i5 is the slave, receiving internet from the N7 - "reverse tethering". 
It's just shit art and a shit band.  Downvote me, Ireland. 
Got it at line at Walmart. Rushed home  Am disappoint.
I'm definitely picking up what your puttin down...don't get me wrong, it's sweet to see Perryman blast fools onto their backs...but Kendrick's seems to be more complete...and few of his ints were pretty sick.
Yea in the comics Bruce Wayne/Batman has blue eyes.
If you liked that, have a look at the [first article I wrote there](http://uncyclopedia.wikia.com/wiki/Linux)!
"A bit"?
Rain drops, lol
I don't know how you read that from my comment, but anyway... It's very important to teach students foundational academic skills which will serve them in college and for the rest of their lives: math, english, etc. Teachers are responsible for not only teaching this stuff, but also for making the case that it is important, and that students will need it in their lives, so that they will use it and learn to improve their faculties independently. In other words, they learn how to learn. In order to be comprehensible, advanced subjects, i.e. life skills, require the above foundational knowledge.  
Shoulders, biceps, probably some quads. Might as well enjoy it all!
Well im gunna make a post and and if i get a deal for my vita so i can get a few 3ds games, then you most likely have a deal
WE'RE HERE FROM THE GOVERNMENT AND WE ARE HERE TO HELP YOU.  MY FUCKING ASS
I've already done this.
Do the prophets have a solid grasp of time? How would they really know to stop them more than once.
We live in a 3+2 bedroom house, where the +2 rooms will never ever be bedrooms except for when we have guests and then all the shit in them gets tossed in whatever available closet space we have! Doors are almost always closed to these rooms. If we have more than 2 kids, I don't know where they will sleep. Maybe on a pile of something I needed 3 years ago.
damn that sucks
Woo! Not too brag, but I'm going to the first public showing on it tonight! (Avengers) ... Ok, that was totally just to brag.
The rage passive, sheen proc, and as are all great on nocturne. In its awesome if your doing well. But if you're behind its not worth the gold required because you still want Bork and some tank items.
I want so much, just lack the dough. I was even born in sandiego and brought to illinois. My whole life has been preparation for returning...
  https://youtu.be/LhNdbipWPFY  50% alive, most of his body looks dead, he says he can't feel them in the video.
Ohh he was responding to *you*. Thought it was a response to someone else and you were just to dudes wandering through a thread 11 days late. We can still throw hands about it if you want though.
I don't know... I think there are other, larger factors involved the cause of that movement, although how their parents acted may be one of them.  The divorce rate isn't as high as we are lead to believe.
Could you define a "gopping beret"?
Right, the tens of thousands of people who installed their own all killed themselves.  Electricity is only dangerous if you're stupid and don't follow the electrical code.  Its very simple stuff that you can pick up if you're handy and can read.  Do have a licensed electrician install the crossover switch as most municipalities require that.
I'd like to talk to you about the Church of the Latter Day Saints
@CC: Who are some prominent techno-commercialists? Nick Land, I gather, but who else? 
I never catch their commentary on ballstreams during playoffs!! so frustrating! you get them?
novelty edition GB? or GB5 of novelty?
* IGN + ID: Yuukai, 9163860656  * Account level: 19X  * Leaders: Claire, Selena, Kanon (WIP), Elimo, Loch, Altri, Oulu &amp; Sefia (when 7* comes to global). By request: Shida, Shera, Fadahl, Kuhla, Tesla, Ulkina, Lario for FH.  * Looking for: Colt and Diana leads! If not, any active player is fine.  * Active: Always
Yeah, I'm kind of with you on this one. It's too bad really. 
Agreed   We need to see the podracing scene, as it was originally intended 
Auto zone sells them.  Shit they will check it for free with their own.  
Bully!
Contact your landlord before doing any electrical!  That being said, it appears you do not need a neutral and should be a 1-for-1 swap so long as you buy them for each switch location (the switches will pass a small amount of current through the wires at all times).
Shit, sorry, got that backwards
Interesting. I might have to start doing that. 
At my school we had a who-could-eat-the-grossest-food contest. It was a weird 3rd grade with people eating pennies with peanut butter on them.
I could participate in this, but by that time, you'll be torn to pieces
Howard Hawks 22
8pm! Let's go
did the girls never read the note? I always read the shit teachers make me deliver. I consider it my reward.
Sleepaway Surprise, with a banana hidden inside.  As much as I like the other movies and even the other ice cream more, this reference alone is my favorite.
I don't like her at all but guess what my HG red is? Her lovely NARS Dragon Girl. It's amazing. :)
&gt; without reason to believe otherwise.  Maybe I would consider the idea more if Dragonball characters actually had feats somewhere near to where they are scaled to be, or in this case, a character statement or description how far away that sun was.  &gt;There's a feat you don't like so you try to undermine it.  No, I take consistent feats over unsupported fancalcs.  &gt;You can't pick an choose on what you like best.  Yes I can. It's called PIS and outliers.  &gt;And you still haven't told me what you consider a feat. Tell me a feat.  Beerus destroying a sun is a feat. Guessing how far away it was and calculating reaction speed based on that is fancalcs.
What has sin got to do with OP's question?
Terrible terrible logic. League of Legends is actually a lot more grindy then other mobas. Rune pages, the rate at which you get champions, and so on is actually a lot slower here then many other games. 
So basically, Nords with a very severe skin condition.
I worry that the game will return to the deathball style of TI4 pretty fast right now.
That, good sir, is bullshit. :( I'm really sorry.
Jesus Christ, how fucking delusional do you have to be to miss the point of the movie that hard? It's as subtle as a sock to the jaw.   At least the racists are getting downvoted this time around. That's refreshing to see. 
Pretty machine!
It's only rogue that has it.  Tht isn't abuse, that's crazy smart thinking lol.  If Travis would have landed hits on him then he would have died and he had to go with six less pots to bring what he needed.  The fact of the matter is he took almost no hits in the 43 seconds it took for him to put it on and get it warmed up. That is called strategy, maybe you should use it instead of relying on numbers all the time lad 
Seriously, who hasn't tossed a gun into a lake?  Am I the only one?
Who would even believe that eating butter could help you lose weight? Like, how would that make even a tiny bit of sense? Do these people really know absolutely nothing about food and nutrition?
uh...no.  The picture you like better is poorly exposed with the sky blasted out and white...IS THE SKY WHITE?  No it is blue.  This subs hatred of saturated photos is very stale.  I get it some are oversaturated HDR messes...but to say a blasted out cel phone pic is an accurate representation of earth...is just ignorant.
That is freaking sick but looks expensive. It's most likely made by Garena. I like how GGG puts everything into game play rather than fancy cut scenes.
Tampa Bay has gone over the time limit and now TEN is on the clock with the first pick.
I have no idea how people will clear the first crypts &lt;level 4 now.
Youch.
Restart your browser/clear your cache and it should be fixed. 
And it's more of a factor of money than grades or intelligence.
Could you be a little more vague?
&gt;Please stop perpetuating the myth that acceleration, rotation, or curvilinear coordinates mean you have to bring in general relativity.   Maybe this is semantics, but I think such a strong distinction is unnecessary. GR subsumes and includes everything SR contains and makes no distinction where a connection comes from, the formalism is identical. Curvature is curvature in the math even if it is sourced by proper acceleration. The concept of *generalized* relativity which includes all aspects of relativity is a perspective I've heard from other physicists many times.  For example, a frame with constant acceleration the curvature induces a nonzero vacuum expectation value and you get thermal radiation. All of this occurs on what is otherwise a true flat background and is intimately related to Hawking Radiation.
A
**I DONT EVEN KNOW WHAT I WANT TO HAPPEN AND ITS STARTING**
Hmmm so in short terms, it's like a side thing where TPP members want to meet other people like a group chat kind of thing. That's a pretty good idea IMO. Some of us here (including myself) see TPP than just "oh we're only 1000+ random people". A lot of us got to know each other, joke with each other and learned from each other. I got to known a few good people I some day wouldn't mind getting to know better (if I had that type of time). So yeah it's like what we do here (in terms with sparking conversations with each other) but other at another place. I can see that. :)
A trip to McDonald's with your friends for food, probably drive thru. 
ARE YOU FUCKING SORRY?
[Mario gave me the same as yours](http://imgur.com/dzxL1EH)  [Link gave me Kirby Super Star](http://imgur.com/Rgiwa0A)
At that moment all the voices inputted a single command: "LIVE"
Here is how all [those idiots](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=wptn5RE2I-k) should be handled.
True, though you can find papers about early childhood education, the study I heard of was on NPR and I've looked into it since, you can google it I'm sure =).
W guy dont
&gt; If he was convicted beyond a reasonable doubt, then give him a new trial.  This would be a disastrous legal system
added
[srs4rlz] so confused by this. Good job! 
Jimmy was just on Rogan's podcast and said that he would basically just do the characters to his girlfriend, way before he ever brought them to the show.
So pumped, i just hope we don't trade up.
so whats the point of this thread?
Cause he's serviceable and they much bigger needs at other positions
This is similar to the concept of an [Explosively Formed Penetrator (EFP)](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Explosively_formed_penetrator) which is a conventional explosive weapon that can punch through multiple inches of armor plate.  Cool video.
SAME THING TO BE SAID ABOUT WIDEMAN
It does xD
  My mistake it is the new testament
Yes. I told her I liked her (and I was convinced she liked me back). She told me she isn't looking for anything serious. I stopped hanging out with her and a month later she suddenly became interested.  It changed my perspective on dating a lot.
"Huh... sounds like she has a alcohol problem." *Wilhelm noted.* "I didn't realize Nor was in such a wreck." 
Nice!  Congratulations!  I've only gotten one 10+1 pull with more than one SR, though it was a UR and an SR, so I can't complain too much.
Aye, there's that.
I fully agree. I'm a chick and OP sounds like a stick in the mud. You're on the last day of a trip and can't go out and have fun?
i want it removed, but for different reasons
Michigan is a pretty decent place to live.   
Did they "invest" in a lot of new purchases prior to it being resolved?
I'm happy (and proud!) to be even a small part of this community today.  Might have to get my butt more active. Anyone who steps in for someone going through this stuff cannot by definition be bad in my book. :)
I came out at around 26/27. Was quite surprised that I "hadn't noticed" earlier. I think if you don't grow up with out, adult gays around you, it can take longer to figure out.
Thank you for your response. I really appreciate the thoroughness of checking out your recommendation
Ha, that's awesome.
Nats did this a lot last year. No hit for a few innings and then they'd break out in a huge way.
Neither. Metro Ethernet. 
"I feel like she still is. She tried her best, did what she could. Then I grew up a little bit more, and she started coming home drunk more and more, then one day she just didn't come home at all. The sane part of me says yes. The Haylie part of me says, 'Tell her to fuck off, and then go paint some more.'"
I want what you're smoking.
Thanks for the advice mate, much appreciated!
"I hear babies cry,  I watch them grow,  They'll learn much more,  Than I'll ever know.  And I think to myself,  What a wonderful world."  \- Louis Armstrong
font is off on the back.
Crush On You VIP being properly released would be wonderful. Hopefully we will also see Bonfire Part 3. 
Within 4 hours, the best she could do is switch the color of her pants and top and pulling up the shoulder strap..........gurl u slo! But seriously, I like it. It looks more modern. the weirdly gray top always looked dull.  Also: HOLY F Garnet your hands
Just in case you decide you want amended answers, my play time's 238hrs :)
then let them regret fucking up later in life when they're working a low paying job with no benefits and hard work. They'll sit there thinking "Damn I really fucked up".  IMO there is no use in even trying to discipline/correct little shits that act like that.
Awesome update! Been wondering what you've been up to. Glad to see her back.   Hope you get those wheels sorted out soon, man. 
Right after we all died from the rapture if my memory serves me right. 
10000 DVD's of Paul Blart Mall cop
Coming Soon... to the Sci-Fi channel.
I love to see your first time &lt;3
My sister's kitten broke her leg on top of a kennel like that one you might put a blanket or something on top just to be safe
I drafted Davis and then dropped him preseason, I'm a huge idiot. At least I got Cobb off waivers. Someone dropped him for Kelce haha
They use C#, at least for mychart
That was hilarious. He's so wiggly? I mean that in a good way. 
As much as I like to mock Doc for his phrases, he definitely makes the game come alive. He's got some good descriptive phrases. 
Best Koopaling.
If you aren't gonna answer my question, don't post on it
Oh, so I guess Germany won then? I never remember
I love the lie...."non-scientific study on..."   Who are you kidding! HAAAAAM GRRRRRRLLLLL
Look at the guns on that Mama.
Don't be rude.
doesnt that make the skt ward less valuable since it was for winning world championship
combination of huge internet traffic, terrible infrastructure and landmass.
I don't see a new player like Noxiak lie about something like this.
It takes 58,000 dead leprechauns to make each dose, that's only 50c each. Cheap.
I only play German things in any sort of WW2 game really. Happens with WoT, WoWS (when the kriegsmarine are released), WoWP (in beta when I actually played it), WT:GF, H&amp;G, etc. Just because I love their weaponry and vehicles. Would be easier to just go Russian as they're usually favoured in games like these but then I can't have MG 42's, Messerschmits, and Tigers, etc. So no deal
Uninformed statement? Yes. Dumbest thing you've ever heard? Guranteed not in the top 100. Be more understanding of your fellow flawed human. Hell, I bet even YOU don't know everything. 
honestly i know we need a defensive tackle and im not even worried about corner right know, but for the love of god trade down and pick up some lineman for brady. no theirs not alot of depth their this year but giving an ageing more wise Tom Brady more than a couple seconds in the pocket will be fucking huge for this offence, and i wont have to watch in fear as brady hits the ground 100 times a game.  ps. Super Bowl 50 here we come
When we thought that's all it was, just a forehead, it came to us in our time of need. Thank you Rihanna's forehead.
Probably not. I just add stuff... don't measure a whole lot. Your estimate is probably closer to reality.  That being said... I like me some cheese.
yes, she dances the same, she has done this repetitive deal too in all her new perfomances. We get it. ( I love her still &lt;3)
OOC: D: ... Let me see..... Never watched a super hero movie?
Don't let them come back, PUSH. PUSSSH!
tfw mi familia no es copada como la de dotora furia
i can in an hour or two...
But it will wash out my special powers
The roadrunner
4Head
Hold this downvote
I think the cops kill more white folk than black folk, but I'm just going off of what I heard on TV.  Haven't researched it.
No idea.
Aren't most of their reports actually from the Associated Press? 
These beers are starting to go down pretty quick.
I mean.. Schefty says the same shit.
Mostly the same here.
Just change your filter more often than usual until the water is clear.  It shouldn't take too long.
As someone who just installed an AppRadio 4 (as in literally just installed it yesterday), I think it's probably a little premature to jump in. I'm happy with the AppRadio, but I was coming from a factory radio with no Bluetooth or any other features.   I think it's too early to tell if the glitches are Pioneer/Alpine issues or if it's on Apple's end. I have little respect for the software development skills of either Pioneer or Alpine, so I'm inclined to point the finger at them. Once OEMs start installing Carplay we should have a better idea.   Speaking of OEMs, once we see Carplay in factory systems I think Carplay will start to offer more apps and features. I don't know how Carplay apps are added to existing apps or are vetted by the App store, but they're being added at a snail's pace. Based on the lack of Carplay units on the road, it's hard to blame app developers for not making their apps Carplay compatible.   Unless you have a need (I need Bluetooth for hands free), I would suggest holding off for a few months to see how this plays out.
Holy fucking balls, hold onto your cocks lads. We're about to wreck this wild ride.
Mortgage, cars, whatever else. It won't be the last loan you take
Localbitcoins.com is quick and easy if you don't feel like setting up a Circle account.   But we are running a promo on VT IDs that will run you $125 total for you and your friend with free backup copies. [Details here.](http://www.reddit.com/r/fakeid/comments/343d0m/21now_vermont_promo_started/)
Lol, its the same dilemma we always have with our friends, we all are from around thane in a group of 8 or so and half of them moved to mumbai - western, folks do not prefer much travelling especially on the weekend since they travel already for work during the week.
How do false starts happen at all when in the huddle, the QB can  just say "don't move until I say X"? Only time I would imagine it can happen is if they use silent counts.
So the Bible forbids immorality. Now there's a news flash!  The problem is that you haven't bothered to establish that gay marriage is sexual immorality. Keep in mind that Jesus had absolutely nothing to say about the subject.
Fantastic! They've just gone in Jolene's cookbook and I think we've found our next land journey destination. 
THIS INTRO IS FUCKIN SICK
Get a DropCam. Cloud DVR &amp; Motion sensing alerts.
At this point? No. Our BA with RISP is the worst in baseball right now.
Banana gods banana gods CHEF RAMSEYYY
yep, as far as i hear once you reach the last day of the week youll receive the reward thats why it was extended for another week
Narrated by Hawkeye*
I'm stuck with a Revis and a Ridley jersey. No shame though I'll still rock those jerseys, two awesome players. At least I still have my McCourty jersey..
I really don't get these posts. It's a game, when most people stop playing a game, don't they just quietly and gracefully just stop playing? 
The state i'm in not so long ago got rid of that exact same law. When your chances of needing it most goes up, they take it away . 
Is that a BT5 who is just happy to see me? ;)
I guess the idea is to keep pressure on until it happens.. otherwise it will take another 20, 30 years.  These things take tiiiime
He's lucky, some of the longer suspensions are for 100 - 8000 years. That would suck.
I read them in chronological order starting with Contact Harvest. I really liked reading in chronological order.  I hope to start reading escalation then catch up on the forerunner trilogy.  
Dude looks like he is about to bust a nut 
I've always dripped mine and love it that way. I do coil a but higher than it seems most people do though, I like a single coil on ceramic right around .8 ohms. So not a real common configuration anymore.
Try Pastel Pink, it looks great w/ the purple and on the whole set IMO.
Entirely possible. A little different for me though. I got a lot nicer, calmer after deconverting. There's something a bit nerve-wracking about eternal consequences that always put me on edge. And I hung out with a group that specifically defined Nice and Kind as completely different things. (did anyone else ever run across that? I'm pretty sure we were just justifying being assholes)
It's not contradictory. Snyder's rendition of Bruce Wayne died in that cave, but he will be back. Snyder has all but confirmed it.   "So what I'm saying is, yes, they're dead -- and they went into it ready to die; so there's no sort of trick to it." http://www.ign.com/articles/2015/04/29/batman-team-addresses-that-twist-in-endgame  As for that panel. I think that's supposed to just be a father and his son, not Bruce and Damian. It's reflective of how Bruce was able to save the city. Damian didn't even appear in this arc, and its not clear where this sits in continuity, so it would be weird to hinge such an important hint in something that doesn't track well.
That's probably just a friend, not a beard
yay more effortless filters
Because I'd probably give these to friends around me who are desperate for them.
I had a chance to try the Pure Wand this morning. It felt really, really good!!!  The weight really works to your advantage, and the long handle made everything so much easier. The small end was very easy to use. The large end.... Took a lot of warm up time. That big round ball end felt freakin' gigantic going in!!!!  Definitely the maximum that I can handle currently. It took quite a few trues to get in. But boy did that large end do its magic once I finally got it in my ass.
I would like this as well!
Yes thank you. That's what I meant
Yes. After days of dealing with car accidents and children needing life-saving medical attention they should definitely take some moron with a dildo stuck up her ass VERY VERY seriously.
The addition of quick save helped this a lot. Sure, the no custom vehicles in missions thing is unfortunate, but at least you don't have to rage now because your Adder got destroyed falling off a bridge or w.e
While most athiests (especially in north america) will ridicule the beliefs that the religious will profess, I have yet to see a single atheist "dehumanize" their opposites. When and where have you seen Atheists claiming that the religious are subhuman? or undeserving of human rights? the only times and places that I can even think of that come close to your assertion are some of the dictatorships of the 20th century, and their actions were not motivated by atheism, but rather by the need to control their populations.   
They're honestly really cool, you get used to the "weirdness" of the design way faster than you might expect, and they really do sound very even and consistent across the whole bass.  I'm not really a boutique "coffee table" bass kinda guy, but man, their [Super P basses](http://www.dingwallguitars.com/basses/super-p/super-p-gallery/) make me drool.
But we'd both pay $9.99 to see that.  Isn't he doing stuff for CZW? Aren't they like extreme stuff, they should do a Punjabi Prison Match with CJ Parker.
What's the problem?
Glad to help. Great roast!
Yeah, man. Best reddit app by a long shot.
"I don't believe in _____________“  (insert thing that actually exists)   Eg. Vaccines, climate change, GMOs, evolution, etc. 
Wow. Those are some great words.
lol, the picture is perfect.
It hasn't been confirmed yet, but I'm totally waiting for the Imperial Cutter. I may actually skip the Anaconda if a firefighting equivalent comes out by the time I get rich(Grinding like a mofo once finals are over).
それ国民じゃなくて在留外国人なんじゃ
No indication of that. It looks like the OP just referenced a thread from 3 weeks ago.
Can I come? I'll add you right now.
Hnnnnng the palettes are so gorge!! Definitely need to look into these some more!
Actually, I miss a lot of 4.* press and hold features that are gone now. And the left pull for notification, right pull for settings, but I guess they decided those features were too confusing.
yeah but there is 4 left parties and 2 big right wing, more chance of deals between right surely?
Haven't gifted me yet!
Have they come out and made their endorsement yet?  I mean, we know who they're backing, and always have backed, but you know - out of respect they could at least be plain about it.
Some.
Google zion adventure company.  They can set you up.
He talked to Dan about the Toad theory from Game Theory in a Mario 64 episode.
German diplomacy best diplomacy.
At least we know of the people that responded "atheist" that they don't believe in god. As for those agnostics, who can say..?
You will have hype next year with Parker back. 
The best way to improve your practicing is to understand why you're trying to practice. What are you trying to achieve with this exercise? Are you trying to improve your speed and rhythm? Are you trying to memorize the scales perfectly? Are you trying to make sure each note is articulated and played correctly?  When you struggle in practice, take a moment to focus on one element of the exercise at a time. Just make sure you can play at that tempo. Then make sure you can hit the strings in the right sequence. Then fret the right notes. Then put it together. Yes it's muscle memory, but you need to figure out where the problem is one piece at a time. Take apart the toaster one part at a time to see why it won't heat up your bagel anymore.
Ha, transubstantiated punchline!
just trade me the damn thing xD and give me hatching power lol
For sure. Good acting too - this could have been cringeworthy if they went too over the top.
Fart.
Hello guys, I would like to establish the Kingdom of Sarnor on the rp at some point (whenever I get a free character slot), but it was recently on my mind and I thought it might be good to iron out some details before that happens. So, time for the history mumbo jumbo.  We assume that the Doom of Valyria occurred around 105 BC and directly after that commenced the Century of Blood that swept through Essos. During this time, the Kingdom of Sarnor was decimated by the Dothraki, almost completely slaughtered after the Field of Crows. The Tall Men were driven back to Saath and numbered only about 20,000 after all was said and done and the Century of Blood was over. We'll say it's been about 500 or so years since this point to where the rp is now. My point is to figure out a rough estimate of the current population of Sarnor (other Dothraki raids notwithstanding and can be calculated into the total when all is sorted).   I've done three calculation for you mods to decide between.  * 5% Birth rate (A generous number and the least likely of the three, but I figured I'd throw it in) would leave the current population at 500,000 in the year 505AC * 3% Birth rate (Average, more akin to the birthrate seen in the world today) would leave the current population at 300,000 in the year 505AC * 1% Birth rate (A somewhat low number, but could be completely understandable if factoring other wars and raids into the figure) would leave the current population at 100,000 in the year 505AC  Thank you for reading this little bit! As I said before, these populations do not take into account various other raids or catastrophes that might have happened. Also, I understand this sub is about storytelling and not about hard numbers and the like, but I feel having a mod approved rough estimate of the population would only be a good thing for world building in a civilization that was once destroyed. Thanks!
Just forgot to post the address bro... 
We can always just ask the people who get put on my team, that's a faily accurate description.
I looked into doing some beach camping on the Oregon coast; absolutely no alcohol and a strict 10 pm curfew.  WTF!?  
Where's your Primary Weapon? :/
I just paid $30 to watch this at the NFL Network, so this better be good!
Gotcha, thanks
? bastard!! is a manga lol. XD Here you go http://mangafox.me/manga/bastard/
^__[Verified]__: ^/u/PoliticBot ^-&gt; ^/u/the2ndgodfather __^Ɍ1837 ^Reddcoins__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddCoin/wiki/tipbot_reddit)
cuz pugs are cool. [](#high10)
Not sure if this the right subreddit or if anyone will answer, but here goes nothing. I am looking to get a cheap gaming mouse on Amazon for $35 or less, and have picked out a couple with very high reviews plus good features. This mouse will pretty much exclusively be used to play CSGO, and was wondering if anyone could give me an opinion considering I am pretty new
Something tells me he's not gonna use lube.
Got nothing to add just wanted to say that you are the reason I love Reddit, where I can view others opinions and see a different side of things that I couldn't see before. I find it very entertaining. 
juh-juh-juh-juh-juh-juh-just cant even
Are you trying to tell me you lift 60lbs? Listen, I wasn't asking for advice from freaks of nature that can crush a house with their bare hands. Just regular folk.
Thanks :)
KILL IT WITH FIRE!!!!
I am having a really good day. Let's just keep this good mood going, Kelly. Everything is coming up Milhouse!
[Deleted] Is a pretty good candidate
I laughed when Koots said to leave a comment at the end of the video.
Ersan is drunk
Oh no! The SYNC! I've heard nothing but bad words about it. Should I worry about it? I don't think I would care though, as long as it has Bluetooth.
it's worked OK at least at our elo so far. Wukong is my most-played *and* highest winrate champ
No problem glad we could help. 
Really like it! I was kind of surprised when my bf first asked me to do it, because I couldn't imagine it being very enjoyable for him - but apparently he likes it when he almost can't breathe? I think it feels so good, so I get a bit nervous that I'm getting a bit carried away when I start to grind (which usually escalates to me basically just thrusting myself against his mouth as hard as possible) but he'll always just push me off a bit if I get too into it, takes a few breathes, and then pushes me back on. I like it when he's laid down and I'm squatted onto him, facing his body because then I can usually attend to him with my mouth and hands whilst he does that, haha.
   .----.-----.-----.-----.   /   \  \  \  \  |  \/ |  |   __L_____L__  |   | |  |  (     \  | \___/ / \______/ |  |  \___/\___/\___/    |   \   \  /      /    |      __/  \_       __/   |  |   |   |      |   |      |   _______       
Thank you!
hot coffee
Jack off...a lot
People were definitely calling him  the human highlight reel early in his career when his dunking was nasty.
What a time to be alive!!
You're the expert I'm sorry.   Benning really has no idea what he is doing. 
But not as well as your mom's hand!
came in almost 50 days after ordering - better than nothing and it seems like an isolated incident. 
Thanks! Updated the build. Which CPU, Motherboard, and cooler would you recommend? 
Especially since most deaths back then happened when the fighting was pretty much done and one army began to rout.
This is sickening tbh and I dont understand how this crap is allowed.
ebic bost XDDDD
How fucked are universities when you get injured benching inside? 
That Thing You Do!
Your teacher is on to something.
Crystal Hot Sauce, produced in Louisiana. Its sold nationwide for the most part.
[*Oh it can, baby... It can*](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BlTCkNkfmRY).
I would like the VZ more if I wasn't left handed.
Northern California, May - Sep, on the beach, 60°F, weekday, 11am   Most 'local' people are wearing sweaters, even most joggers are wearing shirts.   One can spot a Brit up to a 1/4 mile away.   They are wearing nothing but their brand-new swim suits which still has creases.   Drunk.  Not 'buzzed'; but obliterated.   Burnt to a crisp.  So much so that they literally glow.   Most of them are very un-Britishly friendly.  Many are eager to explain that, compared to their homeland, liquor is very cheap here.   It's funny on one hand; yet sad knowing that the rest of their 'holiday' will be spent nursing a 2nd degree burn.
Rock and fucking Roll. That's what. 
Icefrog went fucking mad.   I have literally no idea why he buffed Boots of Travel even more they were already broken. 
Well, two of those are probably relatively hard to find, and I forgot the green onion :(
Totally agree, this is a new place that I just discovered. Just a little far of a drive and havent had time to make the trip out there yet. But have stellar reviews as well which is a plus!
Steam IS the drm. Tf2 did not ship with its own drm. 
I think his recovery is perfect the way it is. I think it was in melee too. His is a much much better example of a glass cannon than melee fox. I think both the up b and side b allow for great mix ups overall but have definite weaknesses(length, end lag, no hitboxes on start up for up b etc) I don't think it needs to be messed with at all. I think fox's is one that should get a second look though, along with a few others 
6 years of college and I never thought to do this. Study, I mean. 
I love driving in Atlanta, outside of rush hour, since everyone is so aggressive. If you are driving like an idiot then you'll find out very quickly. 
Got it, thank you. In your professional opinion,  do you think she will live through this?
IMO they failed on AOM on that point as well..   when i first logged in, I saw the new island on the map and went straight there. I started doing quests (starting with the ones from the docks) until they eventually just ended and didn't give me any more. It was a bizarre feeling like I was clearly missing something. Why wasn't i getting any continuation quests to other parts of the island that i hadn't been to?  eventually i googled AOM to find a writeup on what all there is to do in the expansion and low and behold, there's a starter quest in freeport. As if i'm supposed to find that organically.. 
I'm am explicitly not saying one is better over another they both have different uses depending on data and power requirements.  Yes over a mile IS best case, clear conditions, minimal interference, etc, BUT seeing around 4,000 feet average is doable, the antennas are only 100$ a piece, and are around the size of a nexus 7 maybe a half inch or so larger, don't remember, so no, not expensive equipment, just a simple antenna.  Infact there is an xda post of someone who soldered the same antenna to their WiFi antenna inside their nexus 7 2012 and crushed a world record for farthest WiFi controlled drone flight including the own companies best results lol   [Link for those interested](http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1916898)  And yes the video you're streaming to your TV is being streamed over WiFi.
troll/10 great job
https://vacstat.us/
This is going to be an awesome journey! I already took the before pic and can't wait to post some progress pics. Hopefully at the 2 month mark. Good luck!
My university's grad division is causing a similar type of language requirement debacle right now.  Grad students in my field are required to complete a foreign language requirement (either via undergrad diploma, or exam in the appropriate language department).  Foreign students however, cannot use their native language (say, Korean) to fulfil this requirement, nor can they use English (which for them, is a foreign language). So essentially, grad division is requiring students from non-English speaking countries to be trilingual.  
So, in this case, since I just bought my True Blue membership (no loyalty points yet) - I can purchase a ticket on **May 4 @ 4PM** for the Chelsea vs. West Brom match - is that correct? 
On the 0 to 5 vs 5 to 0 thing: You could declare a variable equal to currentTime -q. Then another one equal to that -1. getAttr -t will give you the value of an attr at a certain time. So do two of those at the different times you established and subtract them from each other. If the result is positive the value is going down and vice versa. I'm writing this on my phone I hope it makes some kind of sense. I can write this out better tomorrow if you think it's the right idea. 
He crushed his own voicebox! I TOTALLY didn't do it.
SKOLLLLL
giannis never giving up
...yo
2045 is thirty years away.   Thirty years ago was 1985. Back then current technology included encyclopedias, phone books, glove-compartment maps, 640 K RAM and phones stuck to the walls, with fifty foot cords on the handset if you wanted mobility. The year end top 100 looked like [this](http://www.oldradioshows.com/at100/1985.html). We were half an hour from complete nuclear destruction at all times. Terrorists were Irish and East German, and it looked like South Africa was going to be under apartheid forever.   Things change.
...... [manga spoilers]( /s "read the manga")
http://i.imgur.com/vqMOTbo.gifv
How to load it. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Lf3g9y_wii4
He sounds like some Jewish Nazi hunter.
Neoprene gloves as a fantastic and cheap quality of life type piece of gear to pick up, but honestly, you don't *need* things, just get out there. 
Who else fights dragons?
Yeahh Big Nasty! Represent!
[here is the thread] (http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/2x6bil/taiwan_diamond_khazix_montage_double_jump/) he has some more montages like [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UhT1Hs6GKGM) and [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OoxvI5QTrac)
They didn't lose him, they let him go. 
Bill Clinton 
People this dumb should not be allowed to breed.
"Bud light, please"
http://i.imgur.com/e1rmqnp.gifv
Right there with ya. Very frustrating
For some reason it stuck out in my head a lot more when playing the GBA version. I'm not sure if there is added dialogue in it or not. But the dialogue definitely made it more obvious that Kefka had his eyes on Celes either way.
If you're new to a game, you should expect to get stomped. Having somebody play it should give you a better idea of how the game works.
[**@RapSheet**](https://twitter.com/RapSheet): &gt;[2015-04-30 23:57:03 UTC](https://twitter.com/RapSheet/status/593927074840096768)  &gt;What package are [#Eagles](https://twitter.com/search?q=%23Eagles) talking about to go to No. 1 or No. 2? Two 1st rounders, a 3rd rounder, Fletcher Cox, Boykin, Kendricks, more. Wow.  ----  [^[Mistake?]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Error%20Report&amp;message=http://reddit.com/34gmq6%0A%0APlease leave above link unaltered.) [^[Suggestion]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Suggestion) [^[FAQ]](http://np.reddit.com/r/TweetPoster/comments/13relk/) [^[Code]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster) [^[Issues]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster/issues)
Depends on where you go.
see dubs is a great nickname. Dars not so much. HOWEVER. I propose to YOU, that Darling is a name that needs no nickname to be great. Loved watching the preds series, just got slip Darling into nearly every other sentence. 
Turnbull definitely threw a bit of weight about to get the desired outcome
Actually I was looking for something specifically like this. You shouldn't be so hateful when it's Everyone's subreddit. And Obviously someone benefitted from this post Right Here. Have a good day.
Oh boy 1 dollar if they don't get picked up soon and play in a game the lounge will so what they did for orbit, killing odds but making it more fair.
Ha, this delay has pushed it out of my exam day, win some loose sum I guess
That's the spirit! Clever name too :)
I'm not sure if your GF would be thinking this, but make sure that she knows that none of the suicides were her fault or in any way related to any actions she may have done. I wanted to say that because one of my friends attempted to commit suicide (in my case, it was a happier story because she survived) a couple of weeks ago, and I had a *massive* breakdown and tons of guilty feelings because I wasn't there for her. It's important for someone to say that it's not your GF's fault, but don't bring it up unless she's mentioned that she's feeling that way because otherwise it may be unnecessary. Best of luck with everything...I'm sorry your week has been so bad
Offense looks like the cardinals series so far, good pitching just mowing us down. Lets change it. 
Doesn't say how hard we tried
Bitcoiners love the free market. But only when it doesn't work against them. 
4 boxes every 2 minutes &gt; 2 boxes every 3 minutes 
Plus with the lack of housing complex across the street, it's more empty than usual.
Yup, that was the scariest part as a kid to me.... kinda like the [tunnel scene](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s62msrPjSVY) in Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory.
I'm aware of that, I'm also aware it's a really easy cluster of countries to find on a map.
That was beautiful !
I'd use this just for the tread swap arrows.
Mostly it depends upon whether you were the one who wanted to file, or the one who wanted to stay.  I'm happier now than I was say 6 months ago in my marriage.  But like someone else said.  I'm lonely, and that kind of sucks.  But life isn't all rainbows and sunshine, it's not a permanent situation unless I make it so.  In 31 days I'll be officially divorced, and then I can sit down and think about dating.
God never made a covenant with Abraham do your theology is terribly flawed from the start.  /r/judaism/wiki/jesus  Read all of it please
E-6 clear. Easy is pretty easy. Beat final form after using FCF. My escort fleet killed the wo-class and two DDs, and then a BB one-shot their BB, which more or less sealed the deal... Boss had 50 hp going into night. Overall it was far easier than E-5 from Winter, felt like the accuracy wasn't as bad in combined fleet. Never even failed it.  Significantly less rage-inducing compared to E-5.
whatever man. Like me, don't like me.   I hope you watch the show when I make some episodes. Like it, hate it. I don't care.  I am doing it all for her anyway.
Its something ^_^
Risk legacy... it looks so epic, i have it, haven't played it because i cant start a war with just *anyone*
#####&amp;#009;  ######&amp;#009;  ####&amp;#009;  [**Amy Wong**](https://futurama.wikia.com/wiki/Amy%20Wong) (from Futurama wikia): [](#sfw)   --- &gt;Amy is a klutzy girly-girl who likes to party a lot and is flexible in being wooed by men. She is kind of spoiled due to her parents being rich and she once used to look down on the poor. She has a sense of justice and patriotism but gets frustrated a lot when she is in desperate and hard situations. She constantly gets guilt ridden when she does something wrong. She is also naive and falls for many things. Amy might also be bad at placing and losing things such as failing to hide her wallet in her pocket fully only to get it stolen by people like Bender. She is also rebellious against her parents in their many schemes such as their plot to destroy twelve percent of the Milky way to build a giant mini golf course. &gt; &gt;[**Image**](https://i.imgur.com/QBMh4fq.jpg) [^(i)](http://vignette1.wikia.nocookie.net/en.futurama/images/4/4d/Amy_futurama.jpg) &gt;^Interesting: [^Wong ^family](https://futurama.wikia.com/wiki/Wong family) ^| [^Leo ^Wong](https://futurama.wikia.com/wiki/Leo Wong) ^| [^Inez ^Wong](https://futurama.wikia.com/wiki/Inez Wong) ^| [^Alternate ^Amy](https://futurama.wikia.com/wiki/Alternate Amy)   ^Parent ^commenter ^can [^toggle ^NSFW](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=autowikiabot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot NSFW toggle&amp;message=%2Btoggle-nsfw+cqug9hy) ^or[](#or) [^delete](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=autowikiabot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot Deletion&amp;message=%2Bdelete+cqug9hy)^. ^Will ^also ^delete ^on ^comment ^score ^of ^-1 ^or ^less. ^| [^(FAQs)](http://www.reddit.com/r/autowikiabot/wiki/index) ^|  [^Source](https://github.com/Timidger/autowikiabot-py)  ^(Please note this bot is in testing. Any help would be greatly appreciated, even if it is just a bug report! Please checkout the) [^source ^code](https://github.com/Timidger/autowikiabot-py) ^(to submit bugs)
NFL Network all day!
Yeah I made an order on tuesday through a (supposedly) reliable vendor and still pending and not even a reply to my messages. Still cant manage to cancel order though which is pissing me off. Black bank you can cancel an order with ease and the funds go straight back to your wallet
White
More concise translation: "JEEWWWWWWWWWSSSSSSSSSSSS!!!!"
Basketball IQ is a thing though, unrelated to actual IQ. There isn't necessarily any correlation. 
Oh I got a pm this morning asking me about prison breaks... my bad.
I HOPE EVERYONE OTHER THAN MY TEAM MAKES BAD DECISIONS TONIGHT!
I want to trade down if we can with the browns
Winston will be a bust
38C right now while watching 1080 youtube videos. Load temps with no overclock are in the 65C range. 
STALKERフクシマ版ﾏﾀﾞｰ?
I agree, he could potentially see something that the teammate he's watching didn't.
Look at the people at the bottom of the thread
Maybe it tanks a staled punch but breaks with a fresh one?
Ey, you did another one! And better than ever
Not at all. I'm simply a person interested in how marketing has impacted society and culture throughout history.
Haha, den va la go. Uppröst!
&gt; mental retardation.  &gt;rainman smart  Well....
Definitely don't quote me on this as I'm nowhere near a techie, but I don't think TOR can be DDoS'ed
http://www.thecookierookie.com/adult-root-beer-float/
the award for strangest intro song goes to..
Quick: What do you think that lord's views on open relationships are?
Rightio then, I think I'm best just getting another tablet that can support Miracast.
Yup - Warlock's melee is incredible compared
http://www.reddit.com/r/pcmasterrace/comments/34fpdj/for_those_wondering_heres_how_to_get_rid_of/cqudk2a
http://i.imgur.com/wsg34MB.jpg
LoL. I'm Sry 
By the choices of people who are measurably more empathic, intelligent, and knowledgeable than them. 
I had this problem with my r3s. You might need to double lace your skates as you might by pulling them too tight around the arch of your foot and cutting off circulation.  On my r3s i just skipped a hole where it started cramping and that helped. 
Is it a good idea to play Cevo with 60 fps?
I've never made a granny square, lol.
I thought that it added a nice twist to it
Ah, Ninjew, we feel the same.  Wait! Nin*jew?*  (Do you stalk victims with the cunning stealth of Woody Allen? Do your enemies live in clenched apprehension of being hit with a six-pointed Chinese throwing Star-of-David?)  Sorry. I was sidetracked by hilarious images of Bernie Sanders taking on his opponents by dropping into a Ninja stance and making high-pitched karate noises.
Two amps, on an A/B/Y switcher:  Mesa Boogie MK IV and a Roland JC-120. Dial them up nice and they sound brilliant together.
oh it's okay! that's good. Let me know how it goes :D
Getting alot of mixed feelings from fans  It's not like any other Tech album. The closest thing would be Strangeulation
What I'm afraid of is a potentially smaller bag of tricks for the bat. B-K, at first, makes Banjo look like he is the lead because he's the one walking around for most of the game, doing damage, etc. but Kazooie plays a huge part by running, shooting eggs, flying... they both shared equal parts of the game.  With the Bat, we have flying/floating, sure, but what else? Biting? I fear the Chameleon will have much more to do and therefore hurt the Bat's spotlight (deciding to not pin names yet, just going to go with "Chameleon" and "Bat" in case our lives get flipped, turned upside down)
Not what i meant, and i'm pretty sure you know that.
could you get more PSP? that one smells amazing 
Oh i don't even know, I've got like 3 more ideas atm, and i want to do other characters. But we'll see :p
I agree with everything you said except for the first one. I'd expand it more to be just well-written characters in general.
"Let's Take a Walk: The Curtis Granderson Story"
Forgiven and Monte both agreed the only two ADC's in EU who have a case for being better than him were forgiven and freeze, so there's that as well. 
If that is true Chip is insane.  
;_;
It was a pretty uninteresting mid match up overall though. I can't wait for an actual series between the two teams. 
There's a way with adblocker, gonna check... here it is  http://www.reddit.com/r/CookieClicker/comments/2a9nqf/is_there_any_code_to_make_the_grandmapocalypse/civ81dr
Also reduces damage from turrets which is a bit useful.
Tom Cruise
actually, the surface should not be considered "does everything the iPad does but better".  it does a lot of the same things, worse. and then it does some other things that pc's do that iPads don't, but i mean at that point you're just buying a pc. 
I mean if the baron is free it makes closing the game safe actually 0_o only if they can't defend their base at all would you just push them in.  I always go for all inhibs unless we get an ACE or 4 dead or their carries dead for some time to end the game.
Every reddit account is a bot except you.
Well, yeah, coz that was Humperdinck's plan all along!!
IT'S  TIIIIIIIIIIIIME!!!!
But they are both theories. That's how science works. New evidence could come to light that totally changes how we see the world. You have to accept that our theories are just the best idea we have right now. They may never change drastically - I'm not saying I don't believe in ether of them obviously. It's just important to accept that science is slow process of building knowledge and evidence on top of each other. Being blind to the possibility that you could be even slightly wrong doesn't allow for progress. It's hubris. 
Why is everyone so upset about this? Sure I can understand disagreeing with me but who really cares. I don't tip. I don't think about it. It's not something that I care about. I just go about my life not tipping. I didn't realise so many people take this stuff seriously.   It's cool to see such passion. I just really don't give it that much thought and I don't really care about it. Sorry guys. 
Are you talking about Milton Friedman? If so, he advocated for a negative income tax, not as an endgame strategy, but as a temporary solution to more efficiently transition from a coercive welfare system toward a voluntary one.
We vaccinated our kids
[Link](http://www.publicpolicypolling.com/pdf/2015/PPP_Release_IA_42815.pdf) to the actual report used. Democratic candidate information starts at page 47. 
My slut!
Trucks need to slow the fuck down, but the BMW driver was an idiot.
32 hunter   Swpwrx007
My favorite plane of all time 
nice
They got really creative with some of them. And some of them really make me wonder how ESRB settled with an M reading and not an Ao if they still do that. It's good to take your time with games. I find that the more you binge play the quicker you get tired of it
have you heard me cry out
I watched the whole thing - they never mentioned that in the NA direct.
Because her copyright minions troll reddit looking for images of her to have them removed via DMCA report.
Metriotes sample please
I have three controllers, two have very loud bumpers, one has nice and quite ones, its my favorite!
lets start selling team skins too right
There's a few different devices out there that can override anti-theft systems. It's how thieves will sometimes open exotic cars
Try out r/SSBM. It's a much, much better sub focused on Melee, although it is definitely less active, simply because there are fewer fans of competitive melee than there are of smash in general. 
They need to sell custom pillows with a cut-out so you can use it laying down!
Personally I don't like upgrade rings. I'm sentimental and will never part with the ring my husband gave me when he proposed. I don't care if we can afford a ring 4x better, that's my ring and it was such a special memory, so I cherish it. There are lab made diamonds now too, which are supposedly cheaper than natural diamonds. May be worth looking into also. 
Power is back on now. Telus home Internet still down here... Anyone else?
I'm so scared.
lol, there wasn't one so I just made this one.  I've made later round ones in the past, so figured it would be okay.
"Jet fuel can't melt steel"
The G1 series is fine. It's not the best PSU on the market but it certainly isn't going to kill your system either.
WHITE CIS MALES CAN'T BE OPPRESSED, SHITLORD
What does G&amp;M mean?
I also read it that way, but also thought "This could easily be construed as rape-y. Who approved this?"
NiMHs will get screwy too if you short them. As long as the harness is in good condition, LiPos should be fine.
I actually know someone who never used a condom because he thought he was sterile from all the pot he smoked. He's got 5 kids with his wife now, plus a couple with women before her. You'd think after the first...
I'm all for Pacquiao!  Hope he demolishes Mayweather!
Bwahahaha. I only laugh because that's how I look when I climb. 
You are flawless oh my god
[Repost](http://www.reddit.com/r/Seahawks/comments/34eqmx/russell_wilson_pulled_an_army_soldier_up_into/)
I think I should win because WFT is fun to play plus I actually useWii Fit back from when Wii was new e.e plus Ike would be awesome for codename steam but no FE amiibos have been within reach, robin and lucina I don't think I'll be able to get :(
And they typically don't have a bunch of cranky game wardens lurking about, mostly just annoying block captains.
Seriously...what the fuck was that. That was idiotic.
From a legal/ethical perspective, that's not entirely true.  "You can use the serial numbers provided as a part of the download only if you legitimately purchased CS2, CS2 applications, Acrobat 7, or Audition 3."  Source:  https://helpx.adobe.com/x-productkb/policy-pricing/creative-suite-2-activation-end-life.html#how_to_install  On one hand, they probably don't really care- hence why it's on the honor system, on the other hand, it's clear that they intend for this to be for people who have purchased CS2.
You are a sadist guy. 
What are you looking for for 89 E Johnson?
Natural selection, yo.
It is mildly interesting though.... 
Nothing like calling people idiots while trying to solicit their votes. October is going to be sweet.
it means thay the chutes are deployed but havent fully opened
It's only wrong because YOU deem the word 'colored' racist. People in the 50s used colored like we use black. A non derogatory term used to describe a black person.  If you see it this way and listen to what she says. It's obviously a business decision and not racial.  Also.....they serve many areas where minorities live. 
I do not have enough passion for *anything* to do that to myself.
I have a problem with football and not enough screens, forgive me.
I assume it was over 75% last week when it was released outside of the US.  Then it dropped below 75%.  But their rules say that once they give it Certified Fresh it has to drop below 70% to remove the Certified Fresh.
On a good day? Every few hours. On a bad day, pretty much non-stop to varying degrees.  It's a complex beast. There's a combination of ingrained responses and values that I'm actively working to overwrite, past hurts that don't really get erased by logical counterarguments, the standard battery of subclinical brainmess (self-esteem, anxiety, codependent tendencies etc.), trust issues, communication issues, jealousy, envy, fear, and a sea of unknowns and uncertainties about the future, my relationships and my own feelings, desires and hypothetical responses to new stuff I'll probably have to deal with sooner or later.  But at the end of the day, I chose this and I'm fucking going to make it work.  I've had to experiment with various responses and strategies. I tried to dial back my emotions and care level but it was erratic at best, and constantly fighting myself like that was exhausting.  I've tried opening up and being completely honest and communicative of my feelings and that was even worse, because there's way more stupid whiny petty hurtful shit in my head than anyone else should have to deal with, and I wound up regretting a lot of things I said and instantly wished I could take back. That's just not the version of me I want to present to my partner, or to the world in general.  At the moment I'm hovering around a slightly modified, hopefully more sustainable version of what you've described. I don't *deny* my emotional responses, but I do try to filter them, and force myself to take time to think my way through stuff before I say or do something I regret. Sometimes that means delayed responses or removing myself from situations if I'm not sure how I feel about them, and I don't always get it right, but I think it's helping. I'm working to keep pushing my boundaries and comfort zone, albeit gently, and to stay as outgoingly positive as I can without being insincere. Basically aiming for honest words, pleasant demeanour and trying not to make my problems anyone else's unless I have to. It's still a bit hit-and-miss, but I think I can get it right, and I know it's worth trying.
oh god these alch aghs rushers 4games on patch 4times alch lost...
Well, duh!
This is from the Sapporo Ramen in the Central Square H-mart. Yume's next on my list!
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-y_1TmbMbi0
&gt; People ought to be able to bitch and moan as much as they want.  If this is a 'Freedom of Speech' principle, I'm going to throw out a simple point.  People ought to be *able* but they should not ought to be *inclined.*   'Bitching and moaning'? I think we can both tell from your simple use of terminology that it's just negativity. If it was people throwing compliments in earnest, randomly, I would consider the matter differently. But I do not see much reason in 'bitching and moaning' without seeking a *real* solution.  Bearing in mind I had only read those words as I've typed this. I'm not assuming anything of you.  &gt; The ought to be able to do that without people jumping down their throats calling them 'self entitled assholes'.  I didn't call them assholes. I'm quite careful with things like that.  I'd argued that it's self-entitled and currently I stand by it. I have provided reasons as to why I find that as the case.  &gt; It looks free because you don't pay anything to play it. But if people don't buy skins, if people don't buy champs, if people don't buy stuff, then the game can't exist.  For the record, I've spent a decent sum of money on the game. That shouldn't be relevant, but in the case that you were using a logical fallacy (argumentum ad hominem - "argument against the man") I'd like to refute it. In the case that you're making the point that it is not free, then I'd like to specify that "Free-to-play" refers to those who choose to play it that way.  You are right in saying that without payments, the game could not exist. Could Riot Games even exist if that were the case? Maybe, I don't know. But it is free to many people, and any new player who chooses to play now also has the choice to pay; they are not mutually inclusive options.  Same for any one player who does it now. The only time this changes is if we consider all or most players making this decision.  &gt; As such, we're entitled to say what we like about what Riot adds to the game.  You purchased what you purchased; your skins, your champions, your Rune Pages.  You do not gain entitlement through spending money. You do not gain possession of the game through spending money. You do not gain a louder voice by spending money.  Why would you? It is very ignorant to assume that Riot's on *your* or any other individual's payroll. That's why voting with your wallet is sound reasoning. Does it always get heard, though?  Of course not, because there are -- particularly in League of Legends' case, *millions* of other players making the same considerations but making different choices to you.  If you stopped paying right now, maybe they'll notice a digit or two go down. Do you think that if we both stopped paying right now, it would change their minds at all?  If I had spent £0 on this game, I would consider myself as entitled to talk about the game as I am now. The principle is that it is people's *choice* as to what they do with their money, and if they do not choose to purchase skins/chromas/Riot Points, then that is perfectly acceptable.  So, my overall point is that you *are* entitled to say what you'd like. But not only is that *not* sufficient reason to say what you'd like, but it is *not* because you 'bought' that right.  &gt; It's not being an asshole to say your mind.  Never said it was.  &gt; It's not being a douchebag to complain.  It could just be ignorance, or stupidity, or a temper, or a bad day. Could be plenty of things.  But if you think about it logically and you have a moment of self-awareness, you're not going to 'bitch' unless you thought it would change something. People 'bitch' everyday. To people they know can't resolve the situation.  Going to Reddit? Sure, that could make an impact; people do take in views from here from time to time.  But if someone is going to identify an opposing view as "ridiculous", then I'm inclined to identify such perspective as ignorant, in this case.  &gt; It's our right as the people who make the game what it is.  You have way too much "consumer empowerment" going through you right now.  &gt; And if Riot comes out with a product that I think is fucking stupid and overpriced, I'm gonna say "Riot, that shit is stupid and overpriced. Heroes of the Storm has it for free. Make it the way I want it.".  In other words, you're self-entitled.  Which is fine. But I'd rather go about it some way like this.  "Riot, X as a concept has a lot of potential to work, and I honestly think you can pull it off quite well. But I don't think that it's cost-efficient for many people who play League to actually buy this.   It offers Y, Z, Alpha and Beta, which is great, but there's quite a lot of room for improvement in either cost or features and I think that without it, I'm not going to find it an appropriate expense and I think that that'll be the case for a lot of potential customers, too. I mean, look at your skins and chroma packs; they do pretty well at these prices. I don't know how much work it takes for you to make X and if it *needs* to be that high, but if it can drop down in price, it'd be a much more appealing offer."  Also, you're talking about another game whose skins can cost £10.00 by themselves the *majority* of the time. Only Ultimate skins are like that in League.   If you want to keep trying to quantify between Blizzard and Riot Games, then might I point out the Pay-to-Play *business model* that World of Warcraft has?  *And* it has micro transactions?  Blizzard / Riot Games are apples and oranges, just like MMORPGs and MOBAs or a MOBA and another MOBA. Don't try to draw comparisons, because it's not going to stand very well.
Great! Thanks alot 😘😍
You fuckin' right mate?!
I had to move up to idaho and i miss the mountains alot. Its so flat here.
Conceived 9 months before prom?
Someone has bedhead.
Need more pics, but you seem cute.  Certainly not ugly.
Ronaldo's free kicks are awesome. Love the angle and power he shoots it at
Yea. Two of them.
Can't imagine a fattie would ever want to go back, did he not enjoy sex? 
What other color would a cherry be ?
I'm one of those assholes that does the last one on the highways all the time, but I've noticed that everyone wants to do the middle one.  It's like they get offended when you pass them and try to out asshole you. I'm not racing you, because driving side by side with someone at any speed is retardedly dangerous. You're compounding my already bad decision with an even worse one.
We're getting a second Dachschund in June and need some more name ideas. We're having trouble deciding on anything. I love seeing all of the names on this sub so I thought I'd see if any of y'all have any suggestions!
Heh, but Clancy's stories have come closer to truth than any of this feminist garbage. I mean seriously, we had passenger jets used as weapons against America, Iran has finally decided to become a major problem, and China is screwing around with territorial claims (in South East Asia not Russia...but still).
Uranium. Or plutonium, Or &lt;insert radioactive material here&gt;
Yeah, see my other comment. He got it backwards. 5.1.1 decreased camera quality. 
BIG HOMIE NURKIC! But seriously what the fuck. Oh well, Noel will just win DPOY for the next ten years straight. 
I'm about to try to put a dual triple twisted 28g in it, just worried about the positive posthole being a touch small. I'm sure it will fit, just be a pain setting and clipping it. The build in the pic works really really well but I got some of that pre twisted stuff and figured I'd try it in something other than my Doge.   Don't have TC yet or that would be the next thing cause it does seem to heat up a bit when chain-vaping. 
It takes more than just a kiss for you to start smelling incest.
Hwere do you get off?
smoke a J in front of the boss
We call it McDank around here!
how in the fuck did you do all of that for $1300?  Bravo my friend, bravo. But I prefer the VR6. 
How tall are you?
&gt; The guy in the basement has no obligation to try and keep the game balanced, or stable, or in any way satisfactory for the millions of existing owners of the game.  and yet, people still want modding capabilities ingrained into the game. Since Mojang, the creator of a game that is owned by millions, said they were going to add modding ***half a decade ago***, but have yet to deliver, people looked to unofficial sources for their demands.  &gt; The guy in the basement is free to be selfish and greedy with machine resources to achieve their effects, and need not care if their mod breaks any other features of the game.  People are also free to not download crappy mods.  &gt; The guy in the basement is free to abandon his work at any time and not worry whether the game will survive into the future.  So is Mojang. They don't have to forever keep updating their game.  &gt; Mojang must take these things into account and it constrains what they can do and how they do it.  If Mojang were to add official support, and give a standard to which mods need to meet in order to effectively run in game, the modders would build their mods around that.  Doing otherwise would be like if you built a program and expected an operating system to conform to the program you made.
After three games in the new patch, I've got to ask whether Octarine Core reducing the C/D of Hand of Midas is intended, and if it is, is it OP?  Situationally, it seems like it's almost unstoppable, especially in pubs. Imagine the enemy Bristleback having a 6 minute Hand of Midas, an 18 minute Octarine Core, and then massively outlevelling everyone in the game.  Also why isn't there a chatwheel for 'Wait, let me Mango!'?
Pido también perdón por no profesar con verdadero fanatismo como tu, las "verdades" de nuestros preclaros dirigentes. ¿Qué satánica penitencia se me impone, Mefistófeles?
I'm getting free tickets to the game on Sunday through work. Co-workers and I are going to have quite the party.
I spent a year trying to find one locally. I would spare you that pain, my brother (or sister) - order one (or maybe two, in case in-laws or ninjas steal one) online.  I prefer [this one](http://www.amazon.com/Kuhn-Rikon-Julienne-Peeler-Plastic/dp/B001UOLPMW) over the other one I linked.  In any case, don't buy anything from OXO - makers of knives which are not full tang should be horse whipped and forced to listen to the Frozen soundtrack for a month.
*She smiled and drew his hair carefully.*
I don't mean this in a bad way, but that moon has a strange Beavis quality to it.
the rabid ammounts of people who take everything as canon, TLT songs, fanart, theories and all. It feels like they HAVE to take it all as canon or they'll explode or something,   also, the fact it seems like everyone's a jerk to each other, I'm not saying everyone should be 100% nice 100% of the time, but it still bothers me how people with differing opinions seem like they want to kill each other and drink their blood in a shotglass whilst feasting on their flesh cooked medium rare, it just bothers me.
Man I agree with so much of this 
I really like Woodchuck 
cockroach pizza, another 10$ facebook picture. 5 dollars per extra roach sadly because they know some oil dick is gonna ask for ten cockroaches #spend200dollarsbeforeyouevengetthroughthegatesfest
  https://youtu.be/LhNdbipWPFY  50% alive, most of his body looks dead, he says he can't feel them in the video.
Background?
I like how you describe your psychedelic trip as a journey... That's exactly how it is in experience. When someone else has freaked out during a trip it's comforting to know another has gone through the same thing and understands. It's crazy and probably sounds idiotic to people who haven't partaken, but I'm sure you get it.
We came out swinging in the 1st quarter
Of course. All the reason to repeal public accommodations portion of civil rights act.
If they had just chosen to spawn in a first world country they would've been much better off. I'm not even sure why people bother to try to level up in places other than a first world country.  EDIT: Obligatory /r/outside
I've got goosebumps
I was in Düsseldorf last year and there were signs everywhere in the U-Bahn with something to the effect of "Goldbären brauchen kein Schweinflesich." And the accompanying pictures had a gummy bear made out of pigskin. It was a pretty great campaign.  I could be wrong about the American gummy bears being vegetarian, though. I remember reading that somewhere. I don't eat many gummy bears, but if I did I'd prefer they be Haribo. Alas.
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.**  It looks like you failed to ask a question in your title. Double check everything, including punctuation, and try posting again.   * **If you're wanting to tell a story or explain something, please try /r/Self.**  * **If you're needing advice of any kind, try /r/advice or /r/needadvice**  * **If you're looking for a fact based answer, try /r/answers**  * **If you're looking for something that has slipped your mind, try /r/TipOfMyTongue.**  Anything else not covered try one of the subreddits mentioned in our sidebar that better suits your needs.  If you need more clarification, or feel this was an error, please contact the mods and provide a link to this post, thanks!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Same here, although in '99 I probably would've been happy with Kane or X-Pac winning
That's a little cute. 
create another Spotify account?
I've been on both sides of the spectrum, salty and inducing the salt. I've always wanted to try breaking someone when they're like this. Just out right call him out on it, "get your fucking shit together or fuck off outside until you do have it together". He/she is acting like a child so treat them like a child.  Me and my practise partner have a pretty good relationship psychologically, we'll talk about our mental state particularly the vibe of the play if it's getting off kilter (I have a tendency to get vicious if I've been having a bad day).
I've started selling them I  had over 10 last round of box clearing :/. 
Already 100x better than last years music choice 
i disagree with a lot of that  any good striker Bader cant consistently take down outclasses him on the feet, that would definitely be the case with Rumble, i dont know if you know this but Rumble has great Takedown defense; 85% and Davis couldnt do anything vs him, I doubt Cormier will be able to just lie on him, he might be able to take him down a couple times but its also going to be stand up fight and Cormier could actually win and would be a deserving champ unlike Bader imo  out of curiosity but how has Bader improved a lot? his striking is still not good and he relies way too much on his wrestling, his 2 big wins over OSP and Davis he didnt look all that good, he just outwrestled OSP which he cant do against the elite guys and vs Davis it was just bad stand up fight between 2 wrestlers which nobody won, the judges were just forced to pick a winner and 2 picked Bader
If you can make it as far as Lynnwood you've also got the Denny's.
Does it help you sleep at night if I told you I don't wipe?
Dunno if he does or not but most high-elo known figures know what's going around but most of them dont leak it.
**BOLD PREDICTION: Stephone Williams, ILB from Clemson, will be drafted tonight**
AnV-Cerberus, 32 Hunter
I wouldn't, I would leave. In fact that's what I did. I wasn't married yo my ex thankfully but he was pretty similar, especially the whole thing about making you feel like shit for sticking up for yourself. We were together nearly five years and leaving him was the best thing I have ever done. I don't even want to think about where I would be right now if I had stayed. 
Ah good shout. How are you watching? I'm on Gamepass - is that behind too?
What about CoconutCove
M.A.D.B
Frigidaire model LGGF3043KFS. Sorry for my delay, had to wait till I was home. 
This is nice! :)
I don't ride anymore but I used to a lot growing up. I lived in Bellvue which is about 20minutes west of Fort Collins, Old Town. There is a fantastic little state park there called Lory State Park (which is just on the other side of Horsetooth reservoir if you already know the area). It is very horse friendly and lots of places to unload ect. There are a small amount of bikers and hikers, weekends are busier of course. Pretty much any encounter I have had with folks there is great. Everyone knows the trails and trail etiquette and I've never had any issues. They do day passes or you can get a state park pass as well. I would highly recommend the area. Beautiful trails and not too far from town. 
Yea, he really makes use of the body as a canvas to his advantage. Too many tattoos are ruined because the artist didn't accommodate for the curves, but this one works so well.
This thread rules, op pwnd you all.
A MONSTER. It's just ridiculous how awesome he is as a ST and 7 chem doesn't even matter with this guy. He's the perfect complete forward. 
...Huh.
Any idea how you use it?  Our wine is closed and we want to figure this out. 
Thanks for reading my mind there. That wasn't exactly clear. 
To be honest, I don't seem to live in the world you do...
Apparently the same problem [everyones](http://forums.amd.com/game/messageview.cfm?catid=474&amp;threadid=182079&amp;STARTPAGE=1&amp;FTVAR_FORUMVIEWTMP=Linear) been having. Naxirians story is exactly like mine. Apparently though the BETA drivers fix this so I'm downloading them now.   Edit:Thanks for the reply I've posted everywhere from TomsHardeware to the steam forums and nobodies even tried to help me. 
That is definitely the match from metamoris, which is what you linked.
He started crying on our third date about how much he was still in love with his ex-girlfriend he dated for six months and broke up with a year ago. 
I'd imagine once Chelsea win the league a lot of tickets will go up on the Exchange. Have a feeling quite a few people are holding on to them for now on the slim chance we may be playing for the title come the last game.  That's what I'm hoping for anyway :(
yes
Is Mariota an actual possibility? I can't see a scenario playing out but Wild n Crazy Chip has been surprising me like crazy. 
They don't believe in free will; they believe God causes everything and creates the majority of mankind just to send them into hell.
yes, that satisfies "any old [...] serial adapter" :)
Anyone want to help a UK fan out with a NFLN stream? Believe it or not, our coverage over here is even worse than ESPN.  PM me if you are willing to help, thanks.  EDIT: Sky Sports is actually showing the NFLN feed - thank god - so I'm all good.
Thanks for posting the vendors name.  I got 5g of Righteous's "MXE" (A SUPERB VENDOR OF NBOMES) and it def wasnt MXE... but some disso.  It made me sweat like a 500lb man running a marathon. EDIT:  Legit MXE is a blast.  Take a little be drunkish... take two much hope you have a bed and music to lay down and listen to haha.
The latter is second degree murder if you're black, voluntary manslaughter if you're white, in most of the US.
So glad I gave money for ESTD's kickstarter. It's a great piece of film and I got my now favorite shirt from it too.
Unfortunately you are quite correct with regards to no one implementing policy etc. I live in New Zealand and we have regular round table discussion on law, policy etc. involving law academics, psychologists, criminologists, then our government routinely ignores the advice it asked for. Year after year. 
I physically cringed at "creamy thighs."
Think about this. Hundreds of years ago some important European scholar/artist made that picture and made a design choice in making the horse look that way.   Now I'm laughing at it on the shitter.
A work excuse.  Maybe it's because patients cut me off before I get two words out when I go to discharge them to ask for one, maybe it's because some people obviously are just there for one, but 9/10 times I get aggravated when they ask for one.  Not that there's anything wrong with them wanting or needing one, I think I just have issues
Penguin isn't active either. Idk I'll talk to other officers 
My insurance makes retail pharmacies cost substantially more. You have to use their mail order or pay an extra $25 per prescription month after two months.
My older brother was a serious asshole to me. My revenge was to wipe boogers on the wall next to his bed. He wouldn't notice, but when my mom changed sheets on Sundays, she sure did. Big bro got his ass whooped so many times for that...
it is - quite a few 1000s of years. About 4 and a half million 1000s of years!
Whats so special about it?
DeGrom's looking deGoat so far, but his pitch count is too high to go the distance tonight, I'm worried.
USA NOW, In CORN crops. SFB killing everything. Birds, Bee's. Who is running the EPA? Ex Monsanto.
What about Denmark?
This is the most important. 
I'll consider that. Sounds great.
This is Vader in his Mardi Gras alt.
When you're banging in the waterfall, make sure to put a sock on a nearby rock.
Send me a PM and we can work out details.
Even assuming it's true, a few percentage points difference does not translate into "girls SUCK at math".
If you are being serious, then absolutely and humbly apologize.  However, I get the distinct feeling that you're not. People need to be held accountable for the words that they put on the internet. People read these comments and what they read might actually cause harm. It makes me sick that people like you make fun of such an important and serious issue.
Does this mean we get Konqueror, Katafract, Kolossus and Krusader robots soon?  http://mordian7th.blogspot.com/2011/05/adeptus-mechanicus-legio-cybernetica.html
Or you can just not shame people for what OS they use, there's that too... 
Wonder how that went down...  "Wanna go out for coffee sometime?"  "Grrrrrrggggggllllll."
Yes, I really enjoy it.  And sound like a broker record every time I recommend when one of my friends should seek out therapy.  But it works.  Sometimes, I am on my way to my appointment, like WTF am I going to talk about...everything is good and then end up leaving having learned and talked about so much.  
[Track](https://soundcloud.com/buuudis/yoooo)  Made this like last week.. I think I was listening to Hudmo all day lol.  lemme know what you think and criticize it! thanks 
Dude I am so jelly. I've been dreaming of owning some of Johnathan AC Brown's stuff. I've seen countless lectures of his and the way he conveys himself is really proper.  Luckily I own quite a number of Islamic books already, but I could always use more.
Ok, c'est quoi le lien avec le Québec ? C'est pas /r/canada ici.
I did this. I AM THE 6%! AMA!
Rod Strickland
Looks like something from a horror film
Yeah, most of what I get is from Amazon. For specialty filaments (bronzefill, copperfill, etc) I've kind of found matterhackers more reliable than makergeeks.
The amount of "I'd kick you too," "They're room, their right to kick you," and "Well it's your fault for ______" is just staggeringly stupid. If a person has the skill, their armor shouldn't matter. I'm tempted to make a low rank armor set and try to kill Dalamadur JUST to prove that.
/u/cahbot What do you have for us today?  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fforeveralonebots) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Have any pics of the complete bike? Because that's fking awesome! It's so cohesive in it's design I'd love to see the rest of the thing
**C**
already cum in one hole gotta fill up the other one 
I think I'd like to see London Road...it's certainly something out of the ordinary!
if it can be done i am kind of glad they didnt do it because we would not have seen that rocket launcher shot :)
So much hope tonight. Nothing but bright futures.  Sell the barn for Mariota.
There's room for improvement. He's only been in the league 3 years
I was seriously told "you know how we only use 10% of our brains? I think I'm up to about 25-30%."   All the while I'm thinking, "yeah buddy, you're definitely using 25% of your brain."
We won't be able to see them unless you use a NASA level telescope so no worries. And only some of the drawings will be etched on the moon most stay on the disk.
[](/z06-d) Numberical values ≥1x10^6 .
You're right... I probably should do that.  I'm no supermodel.
Get over it!
Yeah a copy of the stereo video that could be viewed on a DK2 would be better.
People have too much time on their hands for shit like this
I mean I suppose we'll find out. I just have never seen the same level of energy or support behind Sanders that Obama had after he was elected to the Senate.  Sanders reminds me more of a Kucinich.
Nice, thank you! 
No.
they're just trying to dump cutler- not gonna happen
They do make a decent living, it's just through tips. You're coming at this like you feel the American way is inferior, when in fact many people make more from tips than Europeans do through their wages. It's just a different way of doing things (better in some cases, worse in other), but feeling an air of superiority or indignant that you should learn/research a local custom before visiting a foreign country is just flat out ignorant.
I just bought it for $13 with no code from  http://gamedealdaily.com/playstation-4/
Played great defense it payed off on the other side. Also our turnovers are very low.
If you're at the end of the game, you're most likely gonna need to do a another playthrough. Only a dozen or so of Rise's navigation lines are triggered during specific boss fights, and you're most likely leveled too high to pick up all navigation lines you missed. Here's some tips on how I got it:  * Play on Hard or higher difficulty. If you're over-leveled, you'll miss many of her lines.  * You will have to use all of the characters, there's no way around it. In your next playthrough, get to the top of each dungeon, exit, switch out all your characters, and start again from the bottom. Look for enemies that cause status ailments, and keep fighting them with every character until you've heard all the lines associated with that ailment.  * Don't guard or heal characters. Let them get knocked down and affected with status ailments. Each effect on each character has two or three lines associated with getting inflicted with each ailment.  * Don't level up your party's S. Links. Doing so will let characters help each other recover from effects. Rise has dozens of lines for characters recovering from ailments on their own.  * Do level up Rise's S. Link as fast as you can. The lines she says about enemies' weakness at the beginning of each battle count. She also has many lines for when she helps you in battle, including taking damage for you and recovering knocked out characters.  * You can try scanning every enemy you fight, but there's no clear consensus whether those lines count or not. I did it anyway.  I got the trophy in the Hollow Forest on my first playthrough, but I was actively trying to get it to pop. Some people get lucky and get it without trying, but I've heard of others doing three or more playthroughs and never getting it. Do everything you can to trigger lines, and you shouldn't have a problem.
What does wagging mean? 
Dude, you're nuts
JKap in the shower. If you can't get that then some crowd shots will suffice.
RABBLE RABBLE!
&gt; I have grown up around firearms and have a homemade range in a field out back, i shoot a ton and have carried on my person around the house for the past 6 years or so.  This does not make you prepared to use your gun defensively. It has almost zero bearing on how well you will fare in a real fight for your life. You need the stresses of training and the eye of a competent instructor to evaluate you and help you improve. I'm not saying you have to spend thousands of dollars at the top firearms schools in the nation, but just find a decent two day course in your area and sign up for that. It will do wonders for you. 
That neck..
Breast milk. 
Utilizing ports isn't really a software exploit...
What if he really did tank his nations economy, destroy his international reputation, and seize foreign land just to shoot Kim in the head? 
People can talk all the shit they want about Giannis, but at least he plays his damn heart out. That's pretty cool
I wondered when I would see Dickbutt here. Congrats based silverman!
Iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiits TIME! 
I think your previous bias about Wisconsin RBs is effecting how you analyze Melvin. Across the board, most analysts talk about his exceptional ability to read defenses and find cutback lanes v
You're welcome.  Have fun :D
In 5th edition, your skills (perception, deception, investigation, etc) don't use a point system to increase. The bonuses to each skill is determined by two things: your ability score (strength, dexterity, intelligence, constitution, wisdom, charisma) and your proficiency bonus.  Your proficiency bonus scales up as you level, and what skills it's applied to depends on your class and I think your background.  Your ability scores are generated when you make your character, and can be done by what's called the point-buy system that is outlined in the player's handbook, but a quick google search should tell you how it works, as lots of systems, such as pathfinder, and even older versions of D&amp;D use it. Alternatively you can do it old school, and take 4 six sided die, roll them all, drop the lowest die, and add the rest together  The "bonus" from the ability is usually the only number you care about, not the actual score itself, and is determined by taking the score, dividing by two and subtracting 5. So a score of 12, is a bonus of +1, but a score of 8 is a bonus of -1 (note, always round down for this, so a score of 11 is a bonus of 0)  Now for each skill you take the appropriate ability score bonus associated with it (ex wisdom for perception) and the proficiency bonus if applicable and boom, you have your total skill bonus
How would you define "stealing"? Is making something for a wage considered theft on the part of the person paying the wage?
Can you add me? I really need a spiritomb! :D
In a famine or other disaster, the more physically fit people will be the ones who are able to get resources, so even that's not true.
So what? India and south east asia are all absorbing dollar at amazing speed, Saudi would have to burn twice as fast to release more dollar into the circulation. This is before china and russia start accumulating dollar again.  The fed has lost the battle of QE, dollar price is beyond their control.  .  India's forex reserves up at $343.2 b  http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/markets/forex/indias-forex-reserves-up-at-3432-b/article7138186.ece   RBI Monetary Policy | $1 trillion forex reserves: A pipe dream  RBI is aware of the cost of accumulation  http://www.business-standard.com/article/finance/rbi-monetary-policy-1-trillion-forex-reserves-a-pipe-dream-115040300661_1.html  S. Korea's FX reserves inch up in March  http://english.yonhapnews.co.kr/news/2015/04/02/49/0200000000AEN20150402007300320F.html  Russian Forex Reserves Rise  http://seekingalpha.com/article/3050886-a-sign-of-ruble-stabilisation-russian-forex-reserves-rise  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_foreign-exchange_reserves
I had an overlay-vision very similar to this last month. To my understanding, what I saw was "[Indra's Net](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indra%27s_net)", and speaks to the interconnectivity of all things. What I saw was not a metaphor, and I was fully awake, though in a semi-meditative state.   [This page is full of photos, some of which are *strikingly* similar to my vision last month](http://livelightbeing.com/2012/01/17/indras-net/)
Why am I so nervous?
I wanna play your maps, what's your osu user?
&gt;before she started to go evil  But she's coming back to the light side now! Steven's ~~possible~~ prayers have been answered!
They work like any other comm, you do fps and ops to get them (and some weeklies). Once you hit the weekly cap you can't earn anymore for that week. Are you sure you're earning ult comms for whatever fp you're doing and not a different comm? And if you are earning ults are you checking the currency tab in your inventory to see if they're being added?
That's no good :/ For me it's nothing on my end, it's all the business.
This is something I could fall asleep to, I really like this a lot
Yep that sounds like some childish commentating
he might just be trying to get her close to home...
&gt; in 2009 when I was making architectural decisions that the DevEx WPF suite was far behind the WinForm offerings.   far behind in what way? Maybe you thought there were missing features because they didn't mention features that are actually GIVEN by the WPF platform?
I wonder what kind of shoe will drop? A boot? A flip-flop?
Cucumbers are cheaper and taste ok to me.
No it's not. Because I haven't made any other points in this thread.
100000 soldiers managed to kill only 800 Romans, proper embarrassment
Eh, I guess some people could look at it that way. As somebody who played the mother loving shit out of halo 3 back in the day, this game washes me with nostalgia. That's not to say that it doesn't have a ways to go.
When you do that you still space after the period, also an em dash is better than an ellipsis for how you'd like that read. Unless you want people to think you trailed off like a Alzheimer patient and then said Night!  
&gt;But if the final grades are already in, it's getting a little late for second chances.  When are grades "final" ?
Yeah, and the same could be said if they took any other player and they busted. I think you may just be looking for an excuse to shit on the Titans.
I got the same one~ I believe there were three variations in total.   The signatures are of the Japanese VAs for the respective characters.
I think you're missing the point.  OP understands it would still be illegal under our current laws, he's asking why, since there's no chance of children.
I may be blind, but I don't see London Library in The Andy build. It just looks like And4omeda. 
lmfao..violet is the kind of person to post that kind of filth herself.Have you seen her tumblr ?? lol
Very interesting graph, thanks! So then where there's overlap between, say splitter and changeup or slider and cutter, those are distinguished by speed?
I work on small accounts with a flat commission but I was taking advantage of the ability to upsell that none of the other salespeople in the company used or even knew about.   My base commission is $500, which is high considering the volume that can be sold in a day, but I upsold the customer to $2000 more than the usual $200 upfront cost.   That $2000 was all my profit. So that's about the commission from 5 sales.   The company has since eliminated the up selling option because of that sale. 
If you think made good (better than market) gains, and it could go either way, it might be better to sell, then buy back IF it goes down.
http://www.jsonline.com/news/milwaukee/duped-by-innocence-project-milwaukee-man-now-free-b99386015z1-281852841.html
Sure. Good point. But there's a big difference between the big, important coming out conversations with close friends and the casual "do you have a boyfriend" "no I date women" "cool" conversations...   When I was coming out to important people and it was new and a big deal, I needed to hear that it was okay. But if I'm at a party and being introduced to someone and they find out and do the speech, that's when it gets annoying. I never meant that my friends and family weren't allowed to react like that during the initial coming out situation. That's normal. I'm just saying, you don't have to tell every single gay person you meet that it's okay they're gay...
To be honest mods can go both ways, as they can make players easier to spot in some environments but harder to spot in other ones. For example multicam shows up more in desert maps, but hides well in forest settings.   Another example would be pmc skins, they make the player easier to spot due to a lack of camo, but also makes it harder to tell if they're enemy or friendly. 
A lot of the characters are very off in the dub.  Homura comes off as emotionless, which she is distinctly not in the Japanese track, and Kyoko sounds like Angelica Pickles, which is VERY off from her character in Japanese.  Madoka's voice actress comes off as more irritating than she does cute, and you can tell that's what she is trying for.  The only decent one is Sayaka, and that's still several levels below the quality of her Japanese counterpart.
First off. rebound?
i'm about to do the equivalent of watching a spreadsheet fill itself out.  MAKE IT GOOD, CHIP.
You can link overcast through the web?!?! 
god damn no pun intended atheists of reddit but the battles some of you choose to fight...   "I hope one day you look back at this comment and facepalm at yourself."  Ok, this is some of the most entertaining shit i've seen on reddit in a long time. hahaha
Hiko should've joined C9 again, and they should've cut n0thing.
Lenovo Flex 2 14" is sweet.  I got it yesterday and am upgrading from a Lenovo Yoga (the original 2012 version, which I LOVE, but didn't have a 1080p screen like I desired for game streaming).
The most recent rumor is nuts...the entIre team for Marcus 
2 different wars
This has some good stuff on it, but it's fairly FSU centric. I do a pretty comprehensive listing of weekly events on the Tallahassee subreddit. Here was this week's to give you an idea of what kind of shit happens around here. Check back when you'll be in the area for current into. Oh, and the best burgers, grouper sandwich, and oysters in town are at Bird's Oyster Shack across from the round hotel. Just so you know. http://www.reddit.com/r/Tallahassee/comments/3405lu/weekly_update_427_53/
Wtf this guy is selling from the city I live in......
I'd be hard pressed to call it a partnership ( in the getting to know you phase) but Tinder.
TIFU by not knowing that the beta email expired in 48 hours.  I got an email for the beta on the 25th, but I was traveling for work so I figured I would just wait and play this weekend.  I just went to the email to get my code and it's expired.  :-( 
Yes of course, I was aware of that whilst replying. It sparked a great song. 
Caesar is mentioned in the Bible but Christians weren't really seen as a significant movement in the Roman Empire until after the death of Christ during Paul's time.  &gt; Mark 12:16-17   &gt; "They brought one. And He said to them, "Whose likeness and inscription is this?" And they said to Him, "Caesar's." And Jesus said to them, "Render to Caesar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's." And they were amazed at Him."
What I find most amusing about ignorant posts like this is that 90% of the changes rocking MS now were set into place in Ballmer's tenure.   But in terms of presentation he was never a great sell, same as Myerson. Nadella and Belfiore have the presenting chops to be more plausible ~~footmen... ah duck it done typing on this shot windows touch keyboard and shut reddhubb app, ill find my android tablet and finish this post~~ frontmen.   (phew, back on a usable small-tablet keyboard / reddit app)  The only thing that's changed is the perception of those guys at the top, which is important for your regular joe - like the OP, clearly - who judges by how plausible someone looks. It's why Yahoo has Mayer as CEO, it's why a legion of US corporates are headed up by sharp-looking dudes in their 50's, and it's why Apple wouldn't have been the Apple it is now without Jobs. Bald, bug-eyed Ballmer with his sweat stains and strained nerd voice wasn't going to cut it as a frontman in this hyper-self-absorbed age however good his leadership skills were. And they *were* good despite his misses.   Nadella has only just started putting his own stamp on the company and is currently riding high on Ballmer's legacy. 
I would say that over half of all Instagram foodie pics have an egg on them now. It worked out well on this monstrosity though because it kind of let you know when it was done, like a built in timer. 
...DAN BOYLE LOOKS OLDER THAN JAGR
Yoshitaka Naito. He's the Shooto strawweight champion. Asia has a decent amount of fighters under 125.
that tutorial was so much help, thank you so much. All of the ones ive watched so far include loads of thick layers which has been what i've been doing which is making me cakey, going to buy some lighter foundation for all over and then use my dermablend foundation over my spotty areas, get some lose powder and hope it improves. Thank you so so much!!
I do have shitload running in the background, maybe that's it. I'm not worried about it, I still have headroom to OC and I'm happy with the framerates. 
I like dd-mm-yyyy but I could live with yyyy-mm-dd because theres a logical order to it, they both follow the same pattern, putting the month in the middle makes no damn sense.
that tutorial was so much help, thank you so much. All of the ones ive watched so far include loads of thick layers which has been what i've been doing which is making me cakey, going to buy some lighter foundation for all over and then use my dermablend foundation over my spotty areas, get some lose powder and hope it improves. Thank you so so much!!
Lugi looks like UBW Archer...  can't wait for Karl and Grahdens...
My sister in her early 20s changed her name to Pinky, it's changed back now to her birth name but we never called her Pinky.
Does this graph only shows the number of pressers who also commented in this sub?
3 times if you count NATO.
So you telling me learning about selling crack, smoking weed, killing people, learning how  to remix crack.  rap encourages all of this, 
ITC Franklin. Same feel. More legible.
So now we have Modern and...Modern?  
and my axe! ... i mean vote.
Any human interaction can be seen as a form of teaching. When I was Pre-K I was taught to tie my shoes, I learned to read, etc.   What you get out of school is a combination of what you put in, what others put in, and the materials or intelligence among those involved. Case in point - I hated math at a younger age, until I found a teacher that had a disposition that nothing you could say or do could make her mad. She LOVED algebra and she loved teaching. If I had had more teachers like her in my elementary math classes, I would probably have loved math previous to her.   TL;DR - A good teacher, a good mentor, is a big deal at any age.
Rum and coke for these nerves! Go Birds!
He wasn't particularly good the year before coming here.  He was really just a lesser version of Chung just trying to cling onto his career.
How are the Rangers doin?
&gt; Humans aren't inherently evil... they only seem evil when they're self-righteous and wrong.  how very profound, ben affleck
Is there a subreddit for these kind of jokes?
No clue. Not my car.   Those are good questions for him.  He's been hanging onto it for a while meaning to restore it.  All of that could have been done by the previous owner, I do not know.
Love living above Great Scott. I miss the Pill.
You're almost there, just blame DE for giving your dog cancer or something and your bittervet status is locked.
[](/happyflutterbat)Well, I'm still changing sometimes.  But I haven't been acting like an animal. 
***Analyzing FrogeToge***  * comments per month: 24.5 *^I ^help!* * posts per month: 0.8 *^lurker* * favorite sub [RotMG](http://NP.reddit.com/r/RotMG) * favorite words: really, servers, those * age 1 years 0 months  * profanity score 0.8% *^Gosh ^darnet ^gee ^wiz* * trust score 107.7% *^tell ^them ^your ^secrets!*  * Fun facts about FrogeToge  * *"I've noticed that too, I reckon the constant makeshift back line and our recent form has taken a toll on him."*  * *"I've watched this year!"*  * *"I'm a huge EPL supporter!"*  * *"I've watched in a while, still hoping for a good season."*  * *"I've never played on a truly "OP" factions server, sure there were kits that gave you prot 4 every few days, but there's always a way to beat that."*  * *"I've seen so many factions servers I used to play on displaying the message "shutting down when the EULA goes into effect" in the multiplayer tab."*  * *"I've been on break for a month, 4k fame."*  * *"I've caught a peek of seem to be electrifying which is really what I enjoy when attending a match."*  * *"I've never been able to really commit to a BPL team."*  * *"I've got a few series ideas that I might tryout in the near future!"*
That is actually the first one I linked to! The thanks for the response. So the lining doesn't interfere with patches? And I usually wear an XL so I am planning on grabbing a 2XL to fit it over jackets and such. How does this one fit you?
Yes they do. Plenty of people realize it. 
The person who made one of the Enhance Guides doesn't even use the talents that he recommends as the "best" for single target.  http://www.icy-veins.com/wow/enhancement-shaman-pve-dps-spec-builds-talents-glyphs  https://www.warcraftlogs.com/reports/kHXhGwayY9RgMDJ1#fight=16&amp;type=auras&amp;source=9
I feel like a Jewish kid on Christmas morning.
L
Honestly, not as much as I used to. I agree, he was (and still is, presumably) a great villain, but with everything else going on this season and with more formidable foes being introduced/reintroduced (Bill, the Shapeshifter, Giffany, Society of the Blind Eye), I kind of feel like Gideon's been shoved to the sidelines, which I find myself strangely okay with. I don't mind that he will return, but I'm not anxiously anticipating it either.
#dontlikemedontlook
It's not leaked its on the DC Instagram
Pac Man, i honestly don't care to much about boxing,  i just know enough that mayweather is a dick.
Having sex with my girlfriend at least 5 times a day is my main escape. I am FA because I would like a second girlfriend for regular threesomes but she doesn't want to. /s
Most of the time your enemies aren't as dumb as the ones here who just walk into your spells.
THE SUSPENSE
Sounds made up. 
Seems like the term white guilt along with SJW are used to erroneously and deliberately attribute what some people say to something other than empathy.
It was sent out by mail a couple years ago by some cool ass boozebag here
ALRIGHT ALRIGHT ALRIGHT ALRIGHT
You never forget your first. Her eyes were so beautiful I had to keep them.
at least we have giannis
I got everything to work except that Every Cell in the ranges is a hyperlink, but the hyperlinks don't "come"with the new cell:   Sub IF_Else_IF_Function() Dim num As Integer Selection = Worksheets("Source").Range("B2")  If Selection = "1" Then  Worksheets("HomePage").Range("A10:A18").Value = Worksheets("Source").Range("F2:F10").Value ElseIf Selection = 2 Then  Worksheets("HomePage").Range("A10:A18").Value = Worksheets("Source").Range("C2:C10").Value ElseIf Selection = 3 Then  Worksheets("HomePage").Range("A10:A18").Value = Worksheets("Source").Range("D2:D10").Value ElseIf Selection = 4 Then  Worksheets("HomePage").Range("A10:A18").Value = Worksheets("Source").Range("E2:E10").Value ElseIf Selection = 5 Then  Worksheets("HomePage").Range("A10:A18").Value = Worksheets("Source").Range("F2:F10").Value Else Cells(10, 10) = "Fart"  End If End Sub
Apart from all the in-game mechanics, I want to test out the new client, I'm running a horrible crappy toaster and I can manage to run the current PoE at around 20 - 30 FPS. From what I've heard, the new client seems to be really promising and I want to make sure that it can run on crappy toasters too so people like me, don't have problems running PoE and find the best optimization to do so.  Edit : Also, I forgot about removal of desync and the introduction of ping, I'm from India (which means horrible packet loss but I blame that on my ISP from sucking ass) so my ping is always 150 - 200 ms even while using Singapore gateway, this will, to some extent allow me to test out how lockstep mode feels with high ping (which maybe others won't be able to do?) and whether desync is still the more viable option for players with high ping. 
I thought it would be fun to add that for a player like Killua, who can run there in a flash and defeat the captain instead of wasting a card, it's the logical choice. I don't even know if they had a leave card, and I think those are expensive.
gettin stoned, eatin gummy bears, posting to reddit   #myplayoffsmoment
Giggle fart!!!
/r/budgetfood mod here. thanks for the plug!
Sorry to hear about your trouble. I'd imagine most of us on /r/ Pokemon have similar stories. The GTS has been needing serious improvements since it was introduced. GameFreak seems to ignore the criticism when it comes to that aspect of online.
YOU wightant to shrop king drugs.
As a lesbian, after having WAYYY too many straight guy friends profess feelings for me, it is SO NICE to not have to worry about that with my gay male friends. 
Not really. See, if you divide 10000 by 100, which is how many pennies are in a dollar, you get 100.
We would be swimming. He is not interested in public sex. I am more adventurous than he is.  He has social anxiety and would not feel comfortable being around the owners of the airbnb in general, let alone using their bathroom and kitchen. He has to run water while he is using my bathroom at home, and he won't use my kitchen unless i am there. (also because to be polite to my mom - he is okay when she is not there.) and at his house, i can't be near when he is using his bathroom.   I fully support his mental health difficulties and am sure lurkers who have mental health difficulties are happy to hear of someone being so supportive.
Look I saw Blackfish... I think it needs to be released back into the wild. Keeping these in captivity is just cruel. 
True that.
That would be so dope.
But the weird thing is is that she wasn't able to get the exact form down.  Her Pearl form had features of Pearl but did not look exactly like Pearl, and when she wanted to be more strong only one arm and one leg became buff...  Maybe it was due to her regenerating too fast.
LOB something something good stat something something World Series. 
im at 209 hours, i think i might need to call GTAA
I've formatted the hard drive now. It's no biggie. I tried installing the newest windows 10 that came out two days ago or so. Might be fun. THey also released drivers for Win 10. But right now it isnt working very well :P.  THe good news is that the card is working fine! Might need to reinstall Win 7 again though. :)
Loose Cannon is fun to play with, but I don't feel like I'm doing near as much damage (I can consistently land pills with stock).  10% faster spin up hardly seems worth it with the -20% damage, especially with how often you're already spun up before you actually see someone.
Pearl cuz she isn't going to win the crown but she deserves to win something
Uhh, did you mean NSFW? I'm sure I would have remembered this if it was from the show  EDIT: He posted [this NSFW pic](http://i.imgur.com/efzwwYa.jpg)
http://imgur.com/gallery/XXX0Zwu
It feels like black people are the most racist. But they got plot armor on so no one can speak out against it. 
I'm way more interested in what happens with the #2 pick than I am with anything the Packers do. 
is the N/lysandre sold ?
i love it when you do that
Did he pay for the services?
You thought it smelled dank before...
I got a desk job, everybody has a headphone on.  It doesn't take much concentration away from work - select Giants/Dragons, click start, get some work done, come back in 5 minutes and click next, back to work...rinse and repeat.  :D
lol
Me personally, anyone but Kevin White and I'll go home happy. 
Idk why people are quick to say "i dont think DG think about it to this extent". I mean you mention baphomet throughout your post and [here we see ride has a picture of baphomet on his plam] (http://i.imgur.com/cPV0Lry.jpg). He's always been into esoteric shit like the occult, tarot, and lovecraft.
Apparently no Reds stream tonight. Kinda enjoying it, actually...
Break up that dwarf grass or whatever it is when you get a chance, it will propagate much faster. It's tricky to work it out of the rock wool though, something to do when you have some patience and a beverage.
I don't have any link, but when I was looking for a job 3 years ago, there were some offers for senior developer positions that required 5-8 years XP in Android development.
| Blocked Countries: | |:-| | United Kingdom | | Ireland |
NAH WE GENERALLY JUST YELL THE WHOLE GAME
It's a lot more complicated than just living there for a year or two.  You need to transfer your whole life over and make enough money to support yourself for that time.  http://registrar.berkeley.edu/establish.html?no_server_init
3 meters tall?  also is his middle name g?
This might be a stupid question, but would the CBD liquids show up on a drug test? I'm really interested in trying it but there's always a chance I'll get drug tested every month. Also, has anyone actually tried anything with it in it? Does it actually help with anything or is it just like a homeotherapy thing that doesn't work. 
Type,"taking a poop." just do it. 
Psn upanup got 2
Not a teacher but one of mine last year basically told the whole class that we're stupid because he thought we didn't read books and that some students of another university died because they're dumb and were part of an academic group. He was THE dick.
to be fair Ubi already said they would alternate between AssCreed and WatchDoges every year, so this was kind of expected  Although I doubt WD can push as far as AssCreed in terms of how much can you do again without it getting super stale
Things must have changed - good!. My mother was given one against her knowledge or consent when I was born (1987). This was in QLD though, and to be fair QLD was not known for its "forward" thinking approach to patient rights. I was 9 pounds something and the first child.  
http://tv-link.in/tv45.php
One of the things that's easy to forget is the Stanford and UC Berkeley are here. No place else in the world are two of the best computer science schools close enough to loathe one another. Combine those with a liberal culture where it's OK to fail and people willing to take big financial risks, and you have a startup hub.  There are easy-ish answers. There are popular answers. There are no easy-ish popular answers.
What... are you drinking? 
The primary engine of evolution and natural selection is natural variation, not gene mutations. 
Aww stawwp it you!  They were not easy though. I pulled my ass really hard lol. I'm gonna work really hard on ours too because it doesn't look easy for me!  Best of luck com'rad!
Thank you! :)
